{1.
  One should be moderate（适度） in all things. Moderation is always the
  safest way to do things and a virtue（品质）we should have. Let's take 
  the student life for example. There are some students who study too hard 
  and play too little, while there are others who play too much and study 
  too little. On one hand, it is harmful to his health if he has too few 
  exercises, and on the other hand, it is harmful to his mind if he plays 
  too much.
In the matter of eating, one also should be moderate. Do not eat too 
much or too little. Too much eating will make you sick, while too little 
eating will make you weak.
The man of progress is he who neither has too high an opinion of himself
 nor thinks too poorly of himself. If a man thinks too highly of himself,
 he is sure to become very proud, but if he has too poor an opinion of himself,
 he will have no courage to make an advance. Both the conditions above will 
 make you lose your advancing aim. A broadminded man is he who always moves
 within the orbit （轨道）of reasonableness. Whether in any activities in
 life, moderation is one of the best ways to enjoy real happiness.
1．“Someone is moderate” means ______ .
A．he walks neither too fast nor too slowly
B．he has good characters and good ways to do things
C．he is not only safe but also successful
D．he is either tall or short
2．The writer suggests that a student should ______ .
A．have much more time to study than to play
B．spend most of the time playing different games
C．only study hard without any time to play
D．correctly arrange （安排）his time for study and play
3． Moderate eating means ______ .
A．eating as much food as one can if the food is tasty 
B．eating food rich of fat
C．eating a proper amount of food
D．eating either too much or too little
4．If one wants to be broad-minded, he must ______ .
A．believe in himself
B．be full of courage
C．enjoy real happiness
D．do everything that is reasonable
}<bdcd>
{2.
  Daniel Boone was born in the United States in 1734. He didn't go to
  school and couldn't read, although he learned all about the forests,
  streams and hunting. He could move silently like an Indian leaving no
  marks. He loved to live alone in the woods where nothing frightened him.
When he grew up, he married and tried to settle down on a farm. A year 
later, however, he wasn't satisfied and decided to go into the unknown 
western lands, crossing the Appalachian Mountains. When he returned after 
two years, he became famous for his long journey. He brought valuable animal
 skins and told stories about the Indians.
After this, he chose to keep travelling to unknown places. Once he lost to 
the Indians in battle and was taken away. The Indians liked him and became his friends.
Daniel Boone died at the age of 86 . He is remembered as an explorer(探险者)
and a pioneer who lived an exciting life in the early years of American nation.
1．Daniel Boone's early life was mainly spent in ______ .
A．learning about nature
B．hunting with his friends
C．learning useful skills from the Indians
D．studying at home because he couldn't go to school
2．When he got married, Daniel Boone first planned to ______.
A． set up a large farm
B．go on a journey with his wife
C． find food, new land for his farm
D．live a peaceful life with his family
3．Daniel Boone became famous because ______ .
A．he travelled a lot in the western lands
B．he was very good at telling stories
C．he found better animal skins than others
D．he was the first to climb the Appalachian Mountains
4．Why did the Indians want to make friends with him?
A．Because they wanted to learn from him.
B．Because he wanted to make peace with them.
C．Because they wanted to make friends with white people.
D．No reason is told in this article.
5．In this article, Daniel Boone is best described as ______ .
A．warm-hearted
B．strong
C．careful
D．brave
}<adadd>
{3.
  Scientists around the world have been studying the warming of waters in
  the Pacific Ocean known as El Nino. The appearance of El Nino is known 
  to affect the weather around the world. Scientists still do not completely
  understand it. Yet they now find they can use it to tell about the future 
  in different areas of the world.
One example is the work of two scientists at Columbia University in New York,
 Mark Cane and Gordon Eshel. A scientist of Zimbabwe, Roger Buckland worked 
 with them. They have found that when El Nino appears, Zimbabwe has little or
 no rain. This means corn crops in Zimbabwe are poor. The last El Nino was in 
 1991 to 1993.That was when southeastern Africa suffered a serious lack of rain.
The scientists wrote about their recent work in the publication Nature. Their 
computer program can tell when an El Nino will develop up to a year before it 
does. They suggest that this could provide an effective early warning system 
for southern Africa, and could prevent many people from starving.
1．El Nino is known as ______ .
A．the changing of the weather in southern Africa
B．the warming of waters in the Pacific Ocean
C．the weather which brings drought（旱灾）to Africa
D．the weather phenomenon（现象）that brings heavy rains to Africa
2．Scientists study El Nino in order that ______ .
A．they can provide a kind of early warning to the place that will suffer from drought
B．they can tell why Zimbabwe has little or no rain
C．they can do some research work in this field.
D．they can put all this information into their computers.
3．Which of the following is true according to the article?
A．Scientists come to understand how El Nino appears.
B．Three scientists from the U.S.A. work on this subject.
C．Southern Africa suffered a serious drought and many people died from hunger.
D．El Nino has something to do with Zimbabwe's crops.
4．Which of the following is not true according to the article?
A．The computer is used in this research work.
B．Scientists know when an El Nino appears by means of computer program.
C．The scientists published their results of the research work.
D．Nature is the name of the article written recently by the scientists.
5．Choose the best title for this article.
A．Appearance of El Nino Predictable（可预报的）
B．Drought in Zimbabwe
C．Early warning system
D．Weather in Africa
}<badda>
{4.
  For years, business people in Western Europe were worried. They knew they could
  not compete against business from the U. S. The United States is much larger and
  had many more resources than any Western European country. 
Some European people realized that the European nations need to join together to
 help each other. If they could forget their language differences and the differences
 in customs, they might become strong competition against other countries. 
In 1958, six of the European countries----Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg,
 France, Germany and Italy got together and decided to cooperate(合作). They called 
 their group the European Economic Community, or the Common Market． These countries
 agreed to join their resources together. 
Within a few years, the European Economic Community had worked so well that its 
members were more prosperous(繁荣) than many other European nations. Soon, other 
nations began to realize the advantages(好处) of the Common Market. Today the Common
 Market includes most of the important countries in Western Europe. It is helping
 Western Europe to again take its place as a leader among the industrial nations of the world.
1．From the passage we know the U. S. is much richer than ______ in resources. 
A．any other Western European countries
B．any other country in Western Europe
C．any country in Western Europe
D．every country in Europe
2．The members of the European Economic Community have developed fast because they ______ . 
A．share their resources and produce more goods
B．can again take the place as a leader
C．forget the differences in their languages and customs
D．have become strong competition against the U. S. 
3．Which statement is true?
A．The Common Market is only a political association(联盟). 
B．The Common Market is an economic and political association. 
C．The Common Market is only an economic association. 
D．The Common Market is neither an economic association nor a political one. 
4．In order to ______ the Western European countries decided to cooperate. 
A．join together to found a united country
B．help each other to smooth away the differences in customs
C．work and act together for common purpose
D．fight against the U.S. 
5．Today the Common Market has helped ______ again take the place as a leader among the industrial nations of the world.
A．Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg, France, Germany and Italy
B．Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg, France, Germany, Italy and other countries
C．Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg, France, Germany, Italy and other European countries
D．Belgium, the Netherlands, Luxembourg, France, Germany, Italy and other Western European nations
}<cabcd>
{5.
  Perhaps the most famous theory, the study of body movement, was suggested by 
  Professor Ray Birdwhistell. He believes that physical appearance is often 
  culturally（文化的）programmed. In other words, we learn our looks ---- we 
  are not born with them. A baby has generally unformed face features（特征）. 
  A baby, according to Bird whistle, learns where to set the eyebrows（眉毛）by 
  looking at those around ---- family and friends. This helps explain why the 
  people of some areas of the United States look so much alike, New Englanders 
  or Southerners have certain common face features that cannot be explained by 
  genetics（遗传学）. The exact shape of the mouth is not set at birth, it is 
  learned after. In fact, the final mouth shape is not formed until well after 
  new teeth are set. For many, this can be well into grown-ups. A husband and 
  wife together for a long time often come to look somewhat alike. We learn our 
  looks from those around us. This is perhaps why in a single country there are 
  areas where people smile more than those in other areas. In the United States,
  for example, the South is the part of the country where the people smile most 
  frequently. In New England they smile less, and in the western part of New York 
  State still less. Many Southerners find cities such as New York cold and unfriendly,
  partly because people on Madison Avenue smile less than people on Peachtree Street
  in Atlanta, Georgi A．People in largely populated areas also smile and greet each 
  other in public less than do people in small towns. 
1．Ray Bird whistle believes physical appearance
A．has little to do with culture. 
B．has much to do with culture. 
C．is ever changing. 
D．is different from place to place
2．According to the passage, the final mouth shape is formed
A．before birth. 
B．as soon as one's teeth are newly set. 
C．sometime after new teeth are set. 
D．around 15 years old.
3．Ray Bird whistle can tell what area of the United States a person is from by
A．how much he or she smiles. 
B．how he or she raises his or her eyebrows. 
C．what he or she likes best. 
D．the way he or she talks. 
4．People who live ______ are more friendly
A．in largely populated areas
B．in New York city
C．in the country
D．in the North
5．This passage might have been taken out of a book dealing with
A．physics
B．chemistry
C．biology
D．none of the above
}<bbacd>
{6.
  Over two thousand years ago Rome（罗马）was the center of a huge empire. The
  Romans needed a way to move their large armies quickly so that they could protect
  their huge country. They needed land trade routes, so they joined all parts of 
  their empire by a net-work of roads（公路网）. 
Beginning in 300 B．C．, the Romans built roads in Europe, Asia and North Africa.
 By 200A.D., they had built 50, 000 miles of almost straight roads. 
To build their roads, the Romans moved away all soft soil. They dug until they 
reached hard ground. Then they added layers（层）of stone and other things. The 
most important roads were paved（铺设）with large flat（平）stones. Main Roman 
roads were sometimes as wide as ours today. 
To build their roads, the Romans sometimes had to dig tunnels through mountains. 
But they didn't have any machines to help them. So they heated the rock with fire 
and then threw cold water over it. When the rock cracked（裂）, they dug it out.
 Roman soldiers and slaves built the roads with their hands and simple tools, but 
 the roads were so well built that they were used for hundreds of years. 
1．The story tells us ______ . 
A．building roads without modern machines was Roman soldiers’ only job
B．it was no easy job for the Romans to build their roads
C．people in advanced countries still use the old Roman way to build their roads today
D．most people in the African countries still use the old Roman way to dig their tunnels through the mountains
2．To build mountain roads, the old Romans had to ______ . 
A．explode the rock before they started to dig
B．crack the rock with fire and cold water
C．dig through the hard rock with their hands
D．invent some machines to help them with the work
3．On the whole, the story is about ______ . 
A．how to build up our modern roads today
B．Roman tools in building a wide straight road
C．the Romans’ roads built two thousand years ago
D．the reason why the Romans had to build their roads
4．Why did the Romans build so many roads at that time? It was because ______ . 
A．their slaves and soldiers had to do something, or, they would have nothing to do
B．they dared not sail in the ocean and the roads were their only choice
C．they needed land trade roads and the roads to move their grand armies as quickly as possible
D．the old Romans wanted to show how clever they were in building the roads
5．According to the passage, which of the following four choices is correct?
A．The old Romans found soft soil did not make a solid base for the road.
B．The Romans built roads only on flat（平）land
C．Flat stones were mostly used in the roads of Asia
D．The old Romans used to make use of the soft soil for the base of their roads in North Africa
}<bbcca>
{7.
  In one way of thinking, failure is a part of life. In another way, failure may
  be a way towards success. The “spider story” is often told. Robert Bruce, leader 
  of the Scots in the 13th century, was hiding in a cave from the English. He watched 
  a spider spinning a web（蜘蛛织网）. The spider tried to reach across a rough place 
  in the rock. He tried six times without success. On the seventh time he made it and
  went on to spin his web. Bruce is said to have taken heart and to have gone on to 
  defeat the English… Edison, the inventor of the light bulb, made hundreds of models
  that failed before he found the right way to make one. 
So what? First, always think about your failure. What caused it? Were conditions
 right? Were you in top from yourself? What can you change so things will go right next time?
Second, is the goal（目标）you're trying to reach the right one? Try to do some 
thinking about what your real goals may be. Think about his question, “If I do succeed 
in this, where will it get me?”This may help you prevent failure in things you shouldn't be doing anyway. 
The third thing to bear in mind about failure is that it's a part of life. Learn 
to “live with yourself” even though you may have failed. Remember, “You can't  win them all.”
1．This passage deals with two sides of failure. In paragraph 1, the author talks mainly about ______ . 
A．the value of failure
B．how people would fail
C．famous failures
D．the cause of failure
2．The underlined phrase“made it”means ______ . 
A．succeeded
B．failed
C．gave
D．got
3．The lesson the spider taught Robert Bruce seems ______ . 
A．productive
B．straight forward
C．sorrowful
D．deep
4．The author tells you to do all things except ______ . 
A．The think about the cause of your failure
B．to check out whether your goals are right for you
C．to consider failure as a part or life
D．to bear in mind that you will never fail in your life
5．Which of the following is NOT true?
A．Bruce and Edison were successful examples. 
B．Failure may be regarded as a way toward success. 
C．Edison learned a lot from the lesson the spider taught Robert Bruce. 
D．One may often raise a question whether his goals are worth attempting.
}<aaddc>
{8.
  In sport the sexes（性别）are separate. Women and men do not run or swim 
  in the same races. Women are less strong than men. That at least is what 
  people say. Women are called the weaker sex, or, if men want to please them, 
  the fair sex. But boys and girls are taught together at schools and universities. 
  There are women who are famous Prime Ministers, scientists and writers. And women 
  live longer than men . A European woman can expect to live until the age of 74, a 
  man only until he is 68．Are women's bodies really weaker?
The fastest men can run a mile in under 4 minutes. The best women need 4．5 minutes. 
Women's time are always slower than men's, but some facts are a surprise. Some of the
 fastest women swimmers today are teenage girls. One of them swam 400 metres in 4 minutes
 21．2 seconds when she was only 16．The first‘Tartan’in film was an Olympic swimmer, 
 Johnny Weissmuller. His fastest 400 metres was 4 minutes 49．1 seconds, which is 37．9
 seconds slower than a girl 50 years later! This does not mean that women are catching 
 men up. Conditions are very different now and sport is much more serious. It is so serious
 that some women athletes are given hormone （荷尔蒙）injections（注射）. At the Olympics 
 a doctor has to check whether the women athletes are really women or not. It seems sad 
 that sport has such problems. Life can be very complicated（复杂的） when there are two
 separate sexes!
1．Women are called the weaker sex because ______ . 
A．women do as much as men
B．people think women are weaker than men
C．sport is easier for men than for women
D．in sport the two sexes are always together
2．Which of the following is true?
A．Boys and girls study separately everywhere. 
B．Women do not run or swim in races with men. 
C． Famous Prime Ministers are women . 
D．Men can expect to live longer than women in Europe. 
3．“That at least is what people say”means people ______ . 
A．say other things , too
B．don't say this much
C．say this but may not think so
D．only think this
4．What problems does sport have?
A．Some women athletes are actually men. 
B．Some women athletes are give hormone injections. 
C．Women and men do not run or swim in the same races. 
D．It is difficult to check whether women athletes are really women. 
5．In this passage the author implies that ______
A．women are weaker than wen , but faster
B．women are slower than men, but stronger
C．men are not always stronger and faster than women
D．men are faster and stronger than women
}<bbcbc>
{9.
  People bury treasure to stop other people from taking it. They choose a quiet place,
  dig a deep hole and bury the treasure in it. Then they make a map of where the treasure
  is or write down other clues（线索）that will help them or someone else to find it again. 
In Britain a few years ago; a writer wrote about some treasure that he had buried. He
put clues in the story to help readers find it. Thousands of people hunted for the treasure. 
They dug holes all over Britain, hoping to find it. 
One of the most popular adventure stories ever written is Robert Louis Stephenson's 
‘Treasured Island’, an exciting story about a young boy, Jim Hawkins, who is captured by
 pirates and later finds some buried treasure. 
Then there is the true story about a man who had to travel overseas for a year. He did not 
trust banks, so he buried his life savings in a park. Then he went away. On his return, he
 went straight to the park. But the park was no longer there. In its place there was a huge
 building. 
And then there was the man who buried his savings, all in bank notes, in a waterproof（防水的）
 bag. When he dug it up years later, there was nothing left. Worms and insects had eaten 
the bag and everything in it. 
And of course, these are stories about people who bury things and either forget where they 
have buried them or lose the map. 
Although it is true that people sometimes lose their money because a bank fails, banks
 are still the safest place to keep our savings and treasures. 
1．People who bury treasure usually
A．do not trust banks				B．have a little money . 
C．want to live in a quiet place. 		D．expect to lose it
2．The writer in Britain
A．really had buried something. 
B．started a nationwide treasure hunt. 
C．had lost his treasure and wanted people to help him find it. 
D．caused trouble because people dug holes everywhere. 
3．“Treasure Island”
A．is a story about pirates. 
B．is about the adventures of Jim Hawkins. 
C．is the most popular story ever written. 
D．is a well-known fairy tale. 
4．The man who buried his money in a park
A．thought his money was safer there than in a bank. 
B．travelled on the sea for a year. 
C．got his life savings back again. 
D．stayed away longer than he expected. 
5 . From these stories we understand that
A．we cannot trust banks. 
B．we should not trust anyone. 
C．a waterproof bag is not proof against worms and insects. 
D．insects eat anything.
}<abbac>
{10.
  In 1977 , a dead author of detective stories saved the life of a nineteen-month-old 
  baby in a most unusual way. The author was Agatha Christie, a gentle married lady and 
  one of the most successful writers of detective stories in the world.
In June 1977 , a baby girl became seriously ill in Qatar (卡塔尔) , near Sandi Arabia(沙特阿拉伯) .
 Doctors were unable to find out the cause of her illness, so she was flown to London and 
 sent to Hammersmith Hospital. A team of doctors hurried to examine the baby only to discover
 that they, too, were puzzled by the very unusual signs of illness. While they were having a
 discussion about the baby's illness, a nurse asked to speak to them. 
“Excuse me,” said Nurse Marsha Maitland, “but I think the baby is suffering from thallium poisoning(铊中毒) .”
“What makes you think that?” Dr. Brown asked. “Thallium poisoning is very rare.”
“A few days ago, I was reading a novel called ‘A Pale Horse' by Agatha Christie,” Nurse Maitland
 explained.“In the book, somebody uses thallium poison, and all the signs are exactly the same as the baby' s . ”
“You are very careful and you may be right,” another doctor said. “we’ll carry out some tests 
and find out whether it' s thallium(铊) or not.”
Tests showed that the baby had indeed been poisoned by thallium. Once they knew the cause of 
the illness, the doctors were able to give the baby the correct treatment. She soon recovered 
and was sent back to Qatar. Later on it was proved that the poison might have come from an insecticide(杀虫剂) used in Qatar. 
1．Who first suggested the correct cause of the baby's illness?
A．A Doctor in Qatar. 
B．Nurse Maitland.
C．Dr. Brown. 
D．Agatha Christie. 
2．Why was the baby sent to London?
A．She was a British girl whose parents were working in Qatar. 
B．The hospitals in Qatar were full at that time. 
C．She was the daughter of a doctor in one of the places. 
D．The Qatar doctors were not sure they could cure her. 
3．As far as we can tell from passage, Agatha Christie. 
A．had never even met this baby. 
B．had spent a long time as a police officer. 
C．visited the baby in the hospital at Hammersmith. 
D． gave Nurse Maitland some advice on the phone . 
4．Nurse Maitland spoke to the doctors
A．when she heard them discussing the possibility ofthallium poison. 
B．because she could see that the doctors had made a mistake.
C．to suggest a possible reason for the patient' s illness. 
D．after she had read about a horse which had been poisoned.
5．What did the doctor think of the suggestion which Nurse Maitland made?
A．They were very quick to agree with her. 
B．They were unhappy over her interruption. 
C．They said that she was wrong because thallium poisoning is very rare. 
D．They thought it was a possibility worth considering. 
}<bdacd>
{11.
  There has been, in history, a man who was swallowed by a whale and lived to tell
  the tale. The man's name is James Bartley. 
The records to prove his unusual experience are in the British Admiralty. 
Bartley was making his first trip on the whaling ship Star of the East. Suddenly the 
lookout found a huge whale . The whalers knew it was a huge whale by the size of the 
spray it blew into the air. They lowered their small boats. James Bartley was in the 
first longboat . The men rowed until they were close to the whale. A harpoon(鱼叉) was 
thrown and it found its mark. It sank into the whale' s flesh. The maddened beast jumped 
out of the water and broke the boat into pieces. When the survivors were picked up, James Bartley was missing. 
Shortly before sunset, the whale was finally caught. The sailors tied the whale' s carcass
 to the side of the ship. 
Because of the hot weather it was important that they cut up the whale right away. Otherwise,
 the meat would begin to rot and the oil would begin to spoil. When they got to the stomach, 
 they felt something moving about wildly. They thought it would be a big fish still alive inside.
 But when they opened the stomach they found James Bartley. After this trip, Bartley settled in 
 Gloucester, England, and never returned to sea.
1．This passage is mainly about
A．how to hunt whales for their oil and meat. 
B．the hard and dangerous lives that whalers had to live. 
C．the duties of each man on a whaling ship. 
D．a man who was swallowed by a whale and lived.
2．The sailors knew that something was in the whale' s stomach because
A．they could feel it moving about wildly. 
B．the whale seemed very heavy . 
C．the whale was bulging(鼓起来) at one spot. 
D．the captain heard Bartley crying for help. 
3．James Bartley never went to sea again because
A．he wanted different kinds of adventures. 
B．of fright and shock. 
C．he was hurt by the whale. 
D．he often got seasick. 
4． The author, in telling James Bartley's story, gives us information by
A．making us laugh
B．talking about whaling in general. 
C．comparing whaling to other fishing. 
D．dramatically(戏剧性地) telling what happened.
5． The word carcass refers to the
A．whale' s tail .
B．whale' s stomach.
C．dead body of the whale.
D．whale' s side
}<dabdc>
{12.
  Motivation(动机) to satisfy one’s needs is brought about by “drives”, These “drives” do
  not determine man’s behaviour, but rather direct man’s energy towards certain aims. For 
  example, man’s body requires food, which is a biological need, when this need comes up,
  man feels uncomfortable and his thoughts turn to getting food or satisfying that need. 
  If he is very hungry, it will difficult for him to pay enough attention to anything except his need for food.
While all men feel hungry, there is more than one method for helping free people of this 
uncomfortable feeling. How needs are satisfying depends on what we have been taught or what
 we have learned from our experiences. As we grow, we learn shat foods our society considers 
 acceptable, and how they should be prepared and eaten. In some societies, for example, pork 
 is considered a special food while in other societies it is strictly forbidden. In some
 societies fish is always cooked, but in other societies raw (生的) fish is preferred. The 
 way in which we satisfy a drive is a learned response. Nature has not built a food C getting 
 response into man. He cannot just eat whatever he wants of whenever there is food, his 
 satisfaction of the hunger drive, for example, is limited by the rules of a society. Although 
 we are hunger, according to the rules of society, we should not steal food, even if it belongs someone weaker than we are.
1.According to the passage, “drives” _____.
Ａ．can be brought about by motivation
B．.can always decide man’s action
Ｃ．direct man’s energy toward certain goals
Ｄ．follow man’s motivations
2. ____ is a biological need.
Ａ．Motivation			B. Drive
C. Hunger				D. Experience
3. The writer hopes to tell us that ____.
Ａ． man should satisfy his biological needs whenever necessary
Ｂ．man’s needs should always be satisfied without any condition
Ｃ．what man should do if he feels hungry
Ｄ．man’s satisfaction of needs is limited by the rules of a certain society
}<ccd>
{13.
  Washingtom,April4-The United States has more than 90millon families for the first
  time ,but each contains fewer people on average than ever ,the Census Bureau(统计局) reported today.
The 90,031,000 families in the United States averaged 2.64 members each as of last July 1.
“The reason is, in effect, changes in the age structure,” explained Campbell Gibson, a
 population researcher for the bureau. Most Americans born in the great explosion of
 births after World War II are mow in their 20’s and 20’s when they are most likely to
 set up families, he said.
The fact that many are doing so increased the number of families from 80.4million in 1980
 to  88.8 million in 1986 and past the 90 million mark last summer . At the same time, the 
 average number of people per family dropped from 2.75 in 1935 to 2.65 in 1986 and then to 2.64,Mr Gibson said.
By comparison, the 1970 Census found the average family contained 3.15 people Families
 averaged more than four people in 1939 and more than five in 1880. The growing number 
 of ever- smaller families is still going on, but Mr Gibson pointed out that family growth 
 was mot the same as population increase in the 1970’s. The same age factors (因素) that
 are increasing the number of families also happened then, but in the 1970’s the proportion(比例)
 of families in each age group was also growing .
That has not continued in the 1980’s for a number of possible reasons, Mr Gibson said.
For example, in the 1880’s more young people have chosen to remain home with their parents 
instead of setting up housekeeping on their own ,as many did in the 1970’s. This could be 
caused by the increasing cost of housing, he said. Delays in marriage while was not the
 only factor for the family changes.
1.The smaller figure of families reported here is ______.
A．1980   B． 80,400,000   C． 2.64    D． 90 milion
2.How did Mr Gibsin explain the reason of the increase in families? ______
Ａ．About 9.96million new families have been set up since 1980.
Ｂ．All the big families were split into smaller ones.
Ｃ．There is a great number of young people who are newly married.
Ｄ．There was a great explosion of births during the present Second World War.
3.What is the reporter’s attitude (态度) toward the present situation?______
Ａ．peopＡle should get married at a later age .
Ｂ． The average number of family numbers should be 2.64.
Ｃ．It’s not clear in the report.
A.	A.      Ｄ．Young people should set up housekeeping on their own ,as many did in the 1970’s.
4. From the last paragraph we may infer that _____.
Ａ．delay in marriage will not help the number of families
Ｂ．Delay in marriage is the major factor of the family changes 
Ｃ．The writer felt sorry that many young people now delay their marriages
Ｄ． There must be some other factors which have led to the slower family growth in the 1980’s.
}<bccd>
{14.
  Every Chinese-language textbook starts out with the standard phrases(短语) for 
  greeting people; but as an American, I always found myself unable to speak freely
  when it came to seeing guests off at the door. Just a good-bye would not do, yet
  that was all I had ever learned from the terrible books. So I would smile and nod,
  bowing(鞠躬) like a Japanese and searching madly for words that would smooth over 
  the visitor’s leaving and make them feel they would be welcome to come again. In
  my unease, I often hid behind the skirts of my Chinese husband’s kindness.
Then finally, listening to others, I began to pick up the phrases that eased relationships 
and sent people off not only successfully but also skillfully.
Partings for the Chinese include a lot of necessary habitual practice. Although I’m not
 expected to observe or even know all the rules, as a foreigner, I’ve had to learn the 
 expressions of politeness and protest(表示拒绝的话) at a leave-taking.
The Chinese feel they must see a guest off to the farthest possible point-down the flight 
of stairs to the street below or perhaps all the way to the nearest bus stop. I’ve sometimes
 waited half an hour or more for my husband to return from seeing a guest off, since he’s
 gone to the bus stop and waited for the next bus to arrive.
That’s very well, but when I’m the guest being seen off, my protests are always useless. My
 hostess or host, or both, insists on seeing me down the stairs and well on my way, with my
 repeating the “Don’t bother to see me off” at every landing. If I try to go fast to
 discourage them from following, they are simply out to the discomfort of having to run 
 after me. Better to accept the inevitable(不可避免的).
Besides, that’s going against Chinese custom, because haste(doing things quickly) is to 
be avoided. What do you say when you part from someone?” Go slowly.” Not farewell or 
Godspeed(祝福), but “Go slowly.”  To the Chinese it means “Take care,” or” Watch your step”
 ,or some such caution, but translated literally(字面意思) it means “Go slowly.” 
1．It is stated clearly that the writer______.
A. is interested in the Chinese-language textbooks
B. is proud of being able to greet people at the door
C. is unsatisfied with the Chinese-language textbooks
D. is afraid of the standard phrases from the textbooks
2．It can be inferred that the writer______.
A. speaks Chinese
B. lives in the USA
C. dislikes her husband’s ways of seeing guests off
D. refuses to follow the Chinese custom of seeing guests off
3．According to the passage all of the following are necessary in the Chinese partings except______.
A. seeing the guests off to the the farthest point
B. protesting again and again
C. running after the guests
D. saying “Go slowly.” 
4．The Chinese use “go slowly.” in their partings so as to______.
A. slow down the guests
B. ask the guests to take care
C. wish the guests a happy journey
D. warn the guests of danger on their way home
}<cacb>
{15.
  It would be pleasant to believe that all young girls in the past got married for
  romantic reasons; but the fact is that many of them regarded marriage as their only
  chance to gain independence from their parents, to have a provider, or to be assured 
  of a good place in society. A couple of generations ago, an old maid of twenty-five did
  not have much to look forward to, she was more or less fated to remain with her parents
  or to live in some relative’s home where she would help with the chores and the children. 
  Not so any more. In the first place, women remain young much longer than they used to, and
  an unmarried woman of twenty-eight or thirty does not feel that her life is over. Besides, 
  since she is probably working and supporting herself, she is free to marry only when and if
  she chooses. As a result, today’s women tend(倾向) to marry later in life. They have fewer
  children-or none at all- if they prefer to devote themselves to their profession. The result
  is a decline in the birthrate.
The new role that women have developed for themselves has changed family life. Children
 are raised differently; they spend more time with adults who are not their parents: baby 
 sitters, day-care center personnel, relatives, or neighbors. Whether they gain or lose in 
 the process is a hotly debated question. Some child experts believe that young children must
 spend all their time with their mother if they are to grow sound in body and mind. Others 
 think that children get more from a mother who spends with them “quality time” (a time of 
 fun and relaxation set aside for them)rather than hours of forced and unhappy baby sitting. 
 And many child psychologists point out that children kept in day-care centers every day are
 brighter than those raised at home. No matter what it is, one thing about child raising to 
 be certain of is that the longer the child is with the mother, the better.
1．It can be concluded from the passage that______.
A. women today have developed a new role in family life
B. the birthrate is declining as a result of women’s pursuit(追求) of careers
C. women have always been dependent on their parents even after marriage
D. children must spend all their time with their mother if they are to grow sound
2．The change in women’s attitude towards marriage results in all of the following EXCEPT______.
A. more and more women quit(leave) jobs to take care of their children at home
B. women today tend to marry later than they did
C. women have less time to raise children
D. more and more families remain childless
3．People have different opinions over the question as to______.
A. how children should be raised
B. where children should be raised
C. whether children should stay with their parents
D. how long children should stay with their parents
4．The author suggests that______.
A. working women should not have children
B. children should be kept in day-care centers all the time
C. young children should stay with their mother as long as possible
D. women should leave their work to look after their children at home
}<badc>
{16.
  For years and years people have been saying that the rail ways are dead. “We can
  do without railways”, people say as if motorcars and planes have made the railways
  unnecessary. We all keep hearing that trains are slow, that they lose money, that 
  they’re dying. But this is far from the truth. In these days of expensive oil, the 
  railways have become highly competitive with motorcars and planes. If you want to 
  carry people or goods from place to place. They are cheaper than planes. And they 
  have much in common with planes. A plane goes in a straight line and so does a railway.
  What is more, it takes you from the heart of a city into the heart of another. 
  It doesn’t leave you as a plane does, miles and miles from the city center. It doesn’t 
  hold you up as a car does, in endless traffic jams. And a single train can carry goods
  which no plane or motorcar could ever do.
Far from being dead, the railways are very much alive, Modern railway lines give you a 
smooth, untroubled journey. Where else can you eat well, sleep in comfort, feel safe and
 enjoy the scene while you are traveling at speed at the same time? And we are only at 
 the beginning. For we have just entered the age of superfast trains(超速列车), trains 
 traveling at 150 miles an hour and more. Soon we will be wondering why we spent so much
 on motorways we can’t use because we have not enough money to buy the oil and planes we
 can’t fly in for the same reason.
1. Some people think the railways are unnecessary for many reasons except that _____ .
Ａ．planes and motorcars have taken the place of trains
Ｂ．oil is expensive today 
Ｃ．ains are slow
Ｄ．ilways lose money
2. the writer’s idea seems to be that _____ .
Ａ．we can do without railways
Ｂ．trains have much in common with motorcars and planes
Ｃ．motorcars and planes are not as good as trains
Ｄ．trains are as good as motorcars and planes
3. According to the writer, which of the following is not true? _____.
Ａ．It is cheaper to travel by train than by plane
Ｂ．e railway station is usually at the center of a city
Ｃ．en you get off the plane you will find yourself right in he city center
Ｄ． motorcar or plane can carry as many goods as a train does
4. The writer thinks that the railways, far from being dad, are very much alive because _____.
Ａ． can have a smooth and untroubled journey
Ｂ．we’ll not have enough money to fly in planes
Ｃ．we can now travel in super-fast trains
Ｄ．all the above
5. The best title for this passage may be _____ .
A. Not the End , but the Beginning
B. Which is the Best: Train, Motorcar or Plane
C. Trains Are More Competitive than Mortorcars or Planes 
D. Oh, super-fast Trains
}<bdcda>
{17.
When we can see well, we do not think about our eyes very often. It is only when we
 cannot see perfectly that we come to see how important our eyes are.
People who are nearsighted can only see things that are very close to their eyes.
 Many people who do a lot of close work, such as writing, reading and sewing, become
 nearsighted. Then they have to wear glasses in order to see distant things clearly.
People who are farsighted(近视的) suffer from just the opposite problem. They can see
 things that are far away, but they have difficulty reading a book unless they hold it
 at arm’s length. If they want to do much reading, they must get glasses too.
Other people do not see clearly because their eyes are not exactly the right shape.
 This,  too, can be corrected by glasses. Some people’s eyes become cloudy because of 
 cataracts(白内障). Long ago these people often became blind. Now, however, it is
 possible to operate on the cataracts and remove them.
When night falls, colours become fainter to the eye and finally disappear. After your
 eyes have grown used to the dark, you can see better if you use the sides of your eyes
 rather than the centers. Sometimes, after dark, you see a small thing to one side of
 you, which seems to disappear if you turn you head in its direction. This is because 
 when you turn your head, you are looking at the thing too directly. Men on guard duty 
 sometimes think they see something moving to one side of them. When they turn to look 
 straight at it, they cannot see it any more, and they believe they were mistaken. 
 However, this mistake happens because the center of the eye, which is very sensitive(敏感的)
 in daylight, is not as sensitive as the sides of the eyes after dark.
1. We don’t know that our eyes are of great importance until _____.
Ａ．we think about our eyes
Ｂ．we cannot see clearly 
Ｃ．we wear glasses
Ｄ．we have to do much reading
2.According to the passage, a _____ is more likely to be nearsighted.
A. tailor B. doctor C. guard D. painter
3. Those who suffer from cataracts _____.
Ａ．will become blind
Ｂ．cannot be cured (治愈)
Ｃ．may be cured
Ｄ．must move to other places
4. People who are farsighted _____.
Ａ．cannot do a lot of close work without glasses
Ｂ．can only see things that are very close to their eyes
Ｃ．have difficulty reading a book if they hold it at arm’s length
Ｄ．have the same problem as the nearsighted people
5. to see a small thing at night, it is better to look ______.
Ａ．with wide open eyes
Ｂ．with half- shut or narrowed eyes
Ｃ．straight at it 
Ｄ．in a slightly different direction
}<bacad>
{18.
Shanghai: Car rentals(租赁) are becoming increasingly popular as an inexpensive way 
of taking to the roads. Business people, foreigners and families alike are taking 
advantage of the growing industry.
The first car rental firm opened in Shanghai in 1992 and now 12 car rental players
 are in the game, with more than 11,500 cars on their books.
The largest player-Shanghai binshi tourism Car Rental Centre has 10,000 cars from 
deluxe sedans(豪华轿车) and minivans(微型车) to large passenger buses. Santana sedans
 are the big fetteite.
Firms can attract enough customers, for 70 percent of their cars every month. This 
figure shoots up during holidays like National Day, Labour Day and New Year’s Day,
 with some recording 100 percent leasing(租出).
The major market force tests in the growing population of expatriate(移居国外) and 
white-collar employers, who can afford the new service, said ZhuangYu, marketing 
manger of Shanghai Angel Car Rental Co.
1. More and more people prefer to rent a car because _____ .
firms provide cheap cars
the cars people rent are better than their own
it costs less when taking to the roads
it is expensive to travel by train or bus
2. From the passage we can learn that _____.
Ａ．70% of the white-collar employers rent cars on their holidays
Ｂ．almost all the cars in the firms are rented on holidays
Ｃ．more and more cars are rented because the population is growing
Ｄ．people can only rent Santana sedans in car rental firms
3. The underlined phrase “ taking advantage of ” in the first paragraph means ______.
A. use 		B. enjoyment 		 C. benefit 		 D. interest
}<cbc>
{19.
INSIDE
*Zhu to attend Asem in London
China’s new premier, Zhu Rongji is to attend the Second Asia-Europe Meeting(Asem) and
 visit Britain and France between March 31 and April 7 in his first foreign trip since taking office.
Page 2
*Laid-off workers
Beijing will take measure to help the city’s laid-off workers find new jobs this year.
Page 3
*Family reform
China Daily carries a commentary (评论)on family planning policy, which is 
crucial(关系重大) to the country’s future.
Page 4
*Banking reform
The Shanghai Branch of the People’s Bank of China is preparing to initiate(开始着手)
 a series of reforms to improve services.
Page 5
*Education reform
A complete reform in Chinese language teaching is called for in primary and secondary education.
Page 9
Healthy old man
Two Chinese World War II pilots keep healthy in their 80s through regular exercise programmes.
Page 10
 
1. The above section may possibly appear on ______ of China Daily.
A. Page 3		B. Page 1  		C. Page 6  		D. page10
2. From the headline we expect there will be _____ job chances for laid-off workers in Beijing this year. 
A. fewer		B. enough 		C. more 		D. no
3. Premier Zhu will go to Europe to _____.
A. attend Asem in Paris 
B. visit Britain and France from march to April
C. have his first foreign trip
D. attend the meeting and pay an official visit to Britain and France
4. We can infer that Chinese language teaching in primary and secondary schools at present _____ .
A. is satisfactory		　　 B. meets the demand of the society 
C．needs improvement		  D. interests students
}<bcdc>
{20.
Could a CD player, a laptop computer or a hand-held video game send an airline off course?
Unless you are born with feathers, flying requires faith. Passengers have to believe, once
 on board the plane, that a 227000kg machine moving extremely fast in the air is firmly in 
 the pilot’s control. That faith was shaken last week by a report that a DC-10 plane coming
 into New York’s Kennedy airport recently almost crashed(撞毁) when a passenger in the first
 class turned on his portable compact disc player.
The story, first published in Time Magazine, set off people’s concern. Can airplanes really
 be made to change their courses by something as small as a battery-powered CD player? Or a 
 video-game machine? Or any of a dozen electronic gadgets(小器具) and computers that passengers
 regularly carry on board?
Although it may sound impossible, it can’t be ruled out. Every electrical device creates a
 certain amount of radiation. Portable phones, remote-control toys and other radio transmitters
 send out signals that can carry for kilometers, and their use on planes has long been cassette
 players, tape recorders and laptop computers, which make far less electromagnetic(电磁的) noise.
Now there is increasing proof that even these gadgets may be putting aircraft at risk. A
walkman-type radio tuned to an FM station produces oscillations(振荡) that can reach 1.5m 
to 3.5m-far enough, in some planes, to reach the navigation(导航) equipment in and around the cockpit (驾驶员座舱).
No planes have crashed and no lives have been lost-so far. But Time Magazine has got quite
 a few pilot reports linking a series of “anomalies”(异例) to a wide variety of electronic 
 gadgets, from laptop computers to Nintendo Game Boys. In one striking example, a plane 
 flying out of Chicago started going off course while its VOR dials became unclear and 
 danced around. When the passenger in seat 9-D turned off his laptop, the report states, 
 the “panel lights immediately brightened and all navigation aids returned to normal.” 
The U.S. Federal Aviation Administration, pressed by pilots to punish the gadget holders 
on board, published an advisory late last week that Delta Airlines has already made longer
 its list of forbidden devices to include video playback machines and CD players.
With the arrival of new “fly-by-wire” aircraft, which are heavily computerized and even more 
easily to be interfered with, passengers may have to go back to reading paperbacks and watching the in-flight movies.
1．The purpose of this article is to inform the readers of______.
A. the risks connected with flying modern computerized planes
B. the conditions connected with taking off and landing in modern planes
C. the risks connected with using electronic devices while flying in modern planes
D. the conditions connected with sitting within 3.5m off the cockpit in a modern plane
2．The following are four points made in the article, Which is the right order of what happened?
1) Many pilots have reported incidents of interference.
2) It is possible that electrical devices are dangerous.
3) Delta Airlines have forbidden CD players.
4) Passengers put their trust in pilots.
A.1,3,2,4     B.4,2,1,3     C.2,3,4,1     D.4,3,1,2
3．Which one of the following statements is true according to the information presented?
A. Remote-control toys are likely to produce radiation.
B. A DC-10 almost crashed while taking off from Chicago airport.
C. Walkman radios give off signals that can carry for several kilometers.
D. The greatest risk to DC-10 planes comes from electromagnetic interference.
4．According to the U.S. Federal Aviation Administration, the best advice to offer someone
 who was about to travel on a plane would be______.
A. don’t use any electronic devices while your plane is in the air
B. make sure that you are 3.5m from the cockpit before using electronic devices
C. tune into AM radio stations while using your walkman if the plane is in the air
D. check on whether the electronic devices you plan to take on board have been forbidden
}<cbad>
{21.
Random House will have about 1000 titles on show at the 1998 Beijing International Book
 Fair. The titles contain dictionaries. Reference books on studying abroad, computer books, 
 self-improvement books and many best-selling novels.
Among the titles, Random House has chosen 20 to sell to Chinese readers at special prices 
through mail order.
Random House welcomes readers to visit its shops to take a careful, look at the books and 
take the chance to talk with the assistants.
Both Beijing Wangfujing Foreign Language Bookstore and Shanghai Foreign Language Bookstore 
are also exhibiting Random House books in their bookstore during the book fair and throughout
 September. Then addresses of the two bookstores are as follows.
     Beijing Wangfujing Foreign Language Bookstore 3rd floor, 235 Wangfujing Street.
     Beijing 100006, Tel (010)65126349 
     Shanghai foreign Language Bookstore
     4th floor, 390 Fuzhou Road
     Shanghai 200001, Tel (021)63223107
1.Random House is a _______ publishing house.
A. Chinese 	B. Beijing 		C. foreign 		D. Shanghai
2. In the article “Book Fair” means ______.
A. an exhibition of the books  	B. research of the books
C. improvement of the books 		 D. a discussion of the books
3.The Book fair was held in _______.
A. Shanghai 		 B. China
C. Shanghai Foreign Language Bookstore    D. Beijing
4. The title of the article is ________.
A. Beijing Sells Books  		B. Random House at Book Fair
C. Book Fair in Shanghai  		D. Random House Welcome Readers
}<cadb>
{22.
Are you thinking of writing someone a letter? Call instead. It isn’t that expensive,
 especially when you call during the evening, night, or weekend hours. In fact, you 
 can make a ten-minute call anywhere in the continental United States for just $2.60.
For even greater saving, always dial direct, that is, without an operator’s help. 
Rates(资;费) on direct calls are lower after five o’clock in the evening and lowest 
after eleven o’clock at night. Collect, person-to-person, and pay phone calls require 
the services of an operator, and they cost more than direct calls.
Need to call out of the country? Now calls to many overseas places may be dialed direct. 
Check your telephone direction for overseas area codes.
Next time you have good news, or you just want to stay in touch, remember, a phone call
 means so much more than a letter. This has been a message from Southern Bell Telephone Company.
1. According to this passage, when is a dial telephone call cheapest?
A. During weekend hours.   B. After 5 in the evening.
C. During working hours.  	D. After 11 at night.
2. To make a ten-minute call costs $2.60, if you are in New York and want to be connected with a person in ______.
A. Alaska		B. Los Angeles		C. Hawaii 		D.  Mexico city
3. What type of call requires less money?
A.A direct dial call.	   B.A collect call.
C. A person-to-person call.		D.A call from a pay phone.
4. What should one do in order to make an overseas call?
A. Dial the operator.
B. Call tell Southern Bell Telephone Company.
C. Check the phone book for the overseas operator’s number so that he can help you.
D. Check the phone book for overseas area codes so that you can dial direct.
5. This passage is ______.
A. an article		B. letter		  C. a talk		  D. a dialogue
}<dbadc>
{23.
One evening after dinner, Mr. and Mrs. Tisich called a family meeting. “We’ve had to make 
a difficult decision,” Mr. Tisich announced. “You see, your mother has been offered a post
 as codirector of a television station in Chicago. Unfortunately, the station is not here.
 After thinking long and hard about it, we’ve concluded that the right decision is to move 
 to Chicago.” 
Marc looked shocked, while his sister Rachel breathlessly started asking when they’d be
 moving. “It’s surprising, but exciting!” she said. Marc simply said, “We can’t go- I can’t
 leave all my friends. I’d rather stay here and live with Tommy Lyons!” 
The Tisichs hoped that by the time they moved in August, Marc would grow more accustomed to
 the idea of leaving. However, he showed no signs of accepting the news, refusing to pack his
 belongings.
When the morning of the move arrived, Marc was nowhere to be found. His parents called Tommy 
Lyons’s house, but Mrs. Lyons said she hadn’t seen Marc. Mrs. Tisich became increasingly
 concerned, while her husband felt angry with their son for behaving so irresponsibly.
What they didn’t know was that Marc had started walking over to Tommy’s house, with a faint
 idea of hiding in the Lyons’s attic(阁楼) for a few days. But something happened on the way 
 as Marc walked past all the familiar landscape of the neighborhood; the fence that he and his
 mother painted, the tree that he and his sister used to climb, the park where he and his 
 father often took evening walks together. How much would these mean without his family, 
 who make them special in the first place? Marc didn’t take the time to answer that question 
 but instead hurried back to his house, wondering if there were any moving cartons(纸板箱) 
 the right size to hold his record collection.
1．The conflict in this story was caused by______.
A. Marc and Rachel’s different tempers
B. a quarrel between Tommy Lyons and Marc
C. Marc’s disagreement with his parents about their move
D. Mr. and Mrs. Tisich’s remark of Marc’s irresponsibility
2．Marc and Rachel’s reactions to the move were similar in the way that both were______.
A. surprised		B. angry and upset
C. anxious for more details	D. worried about packing
3．The reason for Marc’s going home was that______.
A. he did not want to be left behind
B. he realized his family was essential to him
C. he hoped to reach an agreement with his parents
D. he wished to be a more responsible person
4．What would most likely happen next?
A. Marc would bring his records over to the Lyons’s house.
B. Mr. and Mrs. Tisich would call the police.
C. Marc would join his family for house moving.
D. Mr. and Mrs. Tisich would start searching for Marc
}<cabc>
{24.
Britain’s oldest man made his first visit to London yesterday at the age of 110. Mr. John 
Evans had never found the time or the money- to make the trip from his home near Swansea. 
But, when British Rail offered him an all-expenses-paid birthday trip to the capital, he just could not refuse.
Until yesterday he had never been far from home, except for one trip to Aberdeen. Mr. Evans’s, 
who spent 60 years working as a miner in South Wales, almost made the journey to London once
 before, at the turn of the century.” There was a trip to the White City but it was ten shillings 
 (1 shilling=1/20 pound) return from Swansea-too much I thought. All my money went to the family then,” he said.
During the next two days Mr. Evans will be taken on a whistle-stop tour of London to see the sights.
 Top of his list is a visit to the Houses of Parliament (国会).
The only arrangement he does not care for is the wheelchair provided to move him about if he gets
 tired.” I don’t like the chair business-people will so think I am getting old,” he said.
His secret for a long and healthy life has been well publicized-no alcohol, no cigarette and no 
anger. Before setting off from Swansea with his 76-year-old son, Amwel, he quipped,” I’m glad to 
see they’ve given me a return ticket.” 
1．It was reported that Mr. Evans’s healthy long life was to a certain extent due to his______.
A. wine drinking	B. proper smoking
C. mild temper	D. sense of humor
2．Which of the following statements is true?
A. A single trip from Mr. Evans’s home to the White City used to be ten shillings.
B. The first place for Mr. Evans to visit is the Houses of Parliament.
C. He appreciated people’s arrangement of a wheelchair during his visit.
D. Mr. Evans once made the journey to London at the turn of the century.
3．The word” quip” in the last sentence most probably means______.
A. to make a witty remark	B. to express a happy message
C. to make a wish		D. to tell a joke
4．What might be the best title for this passage?
A. 110-Year-Old Tourist		B. Secret for Long and Healthy Life
C. Free Return Ticket		D. Sight seeing in London
}<cbaa>
{25.
AIQILE Bolivia――more than 80 people died and at least 100 were proved injured in the devastating 
earthquake last Friday, said Bolivia’s national Civil Defense Service director Luis Montero.
The earthquake, which measured 6.6 degree, hit this distant area of eastern Bolivia early Friday morning.
The small towns of Aiquile and Totora, some 620 kilometres and 645 kilometres east of La Paz 
separately had a bad effect. Both have been declared disaster areas.
Scores of people are missing, and as many as 15 000 were left homeless. At least 950 homes in 
the area have been damaged, and as many as 600 destroyed, Montero said. 
1. In the first paragraph, “devastating” means______.
A. frightening			B. astonishing 		C. surprising 		D. destroying 
2.The centre of the earthquake is _______.
A. Aiquile and La Paz 			B. Aiquile and Totora
C. La Paz and Totora  			D. Bolivia and La Paz
3.How many people suffered the disaster?
A. about 180  				B. a lot more than 15000
C. only 80   				D. more than 1000
4.The title of the article is probably ______.
A. The Biggest Earthquake
B. The Earthquake Hit Eastern Bolivia
C. More than 80 People Died
C. 950 Homes Damaged, 600 Homes Destroyed
}<dbbb>
{26.
It doesn’t come as a surprise to you to realize that it makes no difference what you read or 
study if you can’t remember it. You just waste your valuable time. Maybe you have already discovered
 some clever ways to keep yourself from forgetting.
One dependable aid that does help you remember what you study is to have a specific purpose 
or reason for reading. You remember better what you read when you know why you’re reading.
Why does a clerk in a store go away and leave you when your reply to her offer to help is 
“No, thank you. I’m just looking” ? Both you and she know that if you aren’t sure what you 
want, you are not likely to find it. But suppose you say instead, “Yes, thank you. I want a 
pair of sun glasses.” She says,” Right this way, please.” And you and she are off-both eager 
to look for exactly what you want.
It’s quite the same with your studying. If you choose a book at random(随意), “just look” for 
nothing in particular, you are likely to get just that-nothing. But if you do know what you 
want, and if you have the right book, you are almost sure to get it. Your reasons will vary; 
they will include reading or studying “to find out more about”, “to understand the reason for”,
 “to find out how” .A good student has a clear purpose or reason for what he is doing.
This is the way it works. Before you start to study, you say to yourself some thing like this: 
“I want to know why Stephen Vincent Benet happened to write about America. I’m reading this 
article to find out.” Or, “I am going to go over this story to see what life was like in medieval 
(中世纪的)England.” Because you know what you are reading or studying, you relate the information 
to your purpose and remember it better.
Reading is not one single activity. At least two important processes go on at the same time. 
As you read, you take in ideas rapidly and accurately. But at the same time you express your 
own ideas to yourself as you react to what you read. You have a kind of mental conversation 
with the author. If you express your ideas orally, they may sound like this:” Yes, I agree. 
That’s my opinion too.” or “Ummmm, I thought that record was broken much earlier. I’d better 
check those dates,” or “But there are some other facts to be considered!” You don’t just sit 
there taking in ideas-you do something else, and that something else is very important.
This extra process of thinking about what you read includes judging it, relating it to what 
you already know, and using it for your own purposes. In other words, a good reader is a 
critical reader. One part of critical reading, as you have discovered, is to distinguish(辨认)
between facts and opinions. Facts can  be checked by evidence(证据). Opinions are one’s own 
personal reactions. Another part of critical reading is judging source(出处). Still another 
part is drawing accurate conclusions.
1．If you cannot remember what you read or study______.
A. it is no surprise	
B. it means you have not really learned anything
C. it means you have not chosen the right book
D. you realize it is of no importance
2．Before you start reading, it is important______.
A. to make sure why you are reading
B. to relate the information to your purpose
C. to remember what you read
D. to choose an interesting book
3．Reading activity includes______.
A. only two reasons
B. mainly drawing exact conclusions
C. mainly learning about ideas and judging them critically
D. only distinguishing between facts and opinions
4．A. good reader is one who______.
A. relates what he reads to his own knowledge
B. does lots of thinking in his reading
C. take a critical attiutude in his reading
D. is able to check the facts against what he has known
}<bacc>
{27.
The railroad industry could not have grown as large as it did without steel. The first 
rails were made of iron. But iron rails were not strong enough to support heavy trains 
running at high speed. Railroad officials wanted to replace them with steel rails because
 steel was ten or fifteen times stronger and lasted twenty times longer. Before the 1870’s,
 however, steel was too expensive to be widely used. It was made by a slow and expensive
 process of heating, stirring, and reheating iron ore.
Then the inventor Henry Bessemer discovered that directing a blast of air at melted iron 
in a furnace(熔炉) would burn out the impurities（杂质）that made the iron brittle（易脆）.
As the air shot through the furnace, the bubbling metal would erupt（喷发）in showers of 
sparks. When the fire cooled, the metal had been changed, or converted, to steel. The Bessemer 
converter made possible the mass production of steel. Now three to five tons of iron could be
 changed into steel in a matter of minutes.
Just when the demand for more and more steel developed, prospectors discovered huge new 
deposits(矿床) of iron ore in the Mesabi Range, a 120-mile-long region in Minnesota near 
Lake Superior. The Mesabi deposits were so near the surface that they could be mined with steam shovels.
Barges and steamers carried the iron ore through Lake Superior to deposits on the southern 
shores of Lake Michigan and Lake Erie. With dizzying speed Gary, Indiana and Toledo, Youngstown,
 and Cleveland, Ohio, became major steel manufacturing centers. Pittsburgh was the greatest steel city of all.
1．The best title for the passage is______.
A. The Railroad Industry	B. Famous Inventors
C. Changing Iron into Steel	D. Steel Manufacturing Centers
2．According to the passage, how did the Bessemer method make the mass production of steel possible?
A. It directed air at melted iron in a furnace, removing all impurities.
B. It slowly heated iron ore, then stirred it and heated it again.
C. It changed iron ore into iron, which was a substitute(替代物) for steel.
D. It could be quickly found deposits of iron ore under the ground.
3．The furnace that Bessemer used to process iron into steel was called a______.
A. heater     B. steamer     C. converter      D. shower
4．It can be inferred from the passage that the mass production of steel caused______.
A. a decline(衰退) in the railroad industry
B. a revolution in the industrial world
C. an increase in the price of steel
D. a feeling of discontent among steel workers
}<cacb>
{28.
Under proper conditions, sound waves will be reflected from a hillside or other such 
obstruction(障碍). Sound travels at the rate of about one-fifth of a mile per second. 
If the hill is eleven hundred feet away, it takes two seconds for the sound to travel 
to the hill and back. Thus, by timing the interval between a sound and its reflection,
 you can estimate the distance to an obstruction.
During World War II the British used a practical application(应用) of this law to detect
German planes on their way to bomb London long before the enemy was near the target. They 
used radio waves instead of sound waves, since radio waves can make a way through fog and 
clouds. The outnumbered Royal Air Force always seemed to the puzzled Germans to be surprised.
It was radio echoes(回声) more that anything else that won the Battle of Britain.
Since the radio waves were used to tell the direction in which to send the RAF planes and 
the distance to send them(their line of flight, in other words), the device was called radio
 direction and ranging, and from the initials the word radar was invented.
1. Sound waves reflected from a hill can be used to calculate the _____.
A. height of the hill
B. speed of sound
C. distance to the hill
D. intensity of sound
2. Radar enabled the English to ______.
A. prevent German planes being on their may to London
B. direct the outnumbered RAF planes effectively 
C. confuse German bomber pilots
D. number the Royal Air Force
3. The British used radio waves because they ______.
A. were more exact than sound waves
B. could not be detected
C. were more useful that sound waves
D. were easier to use than sound waves
4. The author of this article probably intended to explain ______.
A. exactly how radar works
B. why the British used radio waves in their device 
C. How radar (word and device) Came to be 
D. How radar helped the British win the Battle of Britain
}<cbcc>
{29.
The fiddler crab(蟹) is a living clock. It tells the time of day by the color of its skin, 
which is dark by day and pale by night. The crab’s changing skin color follows a regular 
twenty-four hour cycle that exactly matches the daily rhythm(节奏)of the sun.
Does the crab actually keep time. Or does its skin simply respond to the sun’s rays, 
changing color according to the amount of light that strikes it? To find out, biologists 
kept crabs in a dark room for two months. Even without daylight the crab’s skin color
 continued to change exactly on schedule.
This characteristic probably developed in response to the rhythm of the sun, to help 
protect the crab from sunlight and enemies. After millions of years it has become completely 
regulated inside the living body of the crab.
The biologists notice that once each day the color of the fiddler crab is especially 
dark, and that each day this occurs fifty minutes later than on the day before. From 
this they discovered that each crab follows not only the rhythm of the sun but also that
 of the tides. The crab’s period of greatest darkening is exactly the time of low tide
 on the beach where it was caught!
1. The fiddler crab is like a clock because it changes color ______.
A. in a regular 24-hour rhythm
B. in response to the sun’s rays
C. at low tide
D. every fifty minutes
2. Biologists studied fiddler crabs in order to find out ______.
A. where they can be caught
B. how to use them as clocks
C. whether they change color 
D. why they change color
3. When the fiddler crabs were kept in the dark, they ______.
A. did not change color 
B. changed color more quickly
C. changed color more slowly 
D. changed color on the same schedule
}<add>
{30.
Olaf Stapledon wrote a book called First and last Men, in which he looked millions
 of years ahead. He told of different men and of strange civilizations(文明), broken 
 up by long ‘dark ages’’in between. In his view, what is called the present time is
 no more than a moment in human history and we are just the First Men. In 2000 million 
 years from now there will be the Eighteenth or Last Men.
However, most of our ideas about the future are really very short-sighted. Perhaps we 
can see some possibilities for the next fifty years. But the next hundred/the next 
thousand/the next million? That’s much more difficult.
When men and women lived by hunting 50000 years ago, how could they have even begun
 to picture modern life? Yet to men of 50000 years from now, we may seem as primitive(原始的) 
 in our ideas as the Stone-Age hunters did to us. Perhaps they will spend their days 
 gollocking to make new spundels, or struggling with their ballalators through the cribe. 
 These words, which I have just made up, have to stand for things and ideas that we
 simply can’t think of.
So why bother(困扰) even to try imagining life far in the future? Here are two reasons. 
First, unless we remember how short our own lives are compared with whole human history,
 we are likely to think our own interests are much more important than they really are. 
 If we make the earth a poor place to live on because we are careless or greedy(贪婪)
 or quarrelsome, our grandchildren will not bother to think of excuse for us.
Second, by trying to escape from present interests and imagine life far in the future,
 we may arrive at quite fresh ideas that we can use ourselves. For example, if we imagine
 that in the future man may give up farming, we can think of trying it now. So set your
 imagination free when you think about the future.
1．A particular mention made of Stapledon’s book in the opening paragraph______.
A. serves as a description of human history
B. serves as an introduction to the discussion
C. shows a disagreement of view
D. shows the popularity of the book
2．The text discusses men and woman 50000 yeas ago and 50000 years from now in order to show that______.
A. human history is extremely long
B. life has changed a great deal
C. it is useless to plan for the next 50 years
D. it is difficult to tell what will happen in the future
3．The underlined words in the third paragraph are used in the text to refer to______.
A. the tools used in farming
B. the ideas about modern life
C. the unknown things in the future
D. the hunting skills in the Stone Age
4．According to the writer of the text, imagining the future will______.
A. serve the interests of the present and future generations
B. enable us to better understand human history
C. help us to improve farming
D. make life worth living
}<bdca>
{31.
This incident occurred one morning outside Albert Schweizer’s hospital in the African 
jungle. A patient had gone fishing in another man’s boat. The owner of the boat thought
 he should be given all the fish that were caught. Dr. Schweizer said to the boat owner;
“You are right because the other man ought to have asked permission to use your boat.
 But you are wrong because you are careless and lazy. You merely twisted the chain of 
 your canoe round a palm tree instead of fastening it with a padlock. Of laziness you 
 are guilty because you were asleep in your hut on this moonlit night instead of making 
 use of the good chance for fishing.”
He turned to the patient: “But you were in the wrong when you took the boat without
 asking the owner’s permission. You were in the right because you were not so lazy 
 as he was and you did want to let the moonlit night go by without making some use of it.”
Dr. Schwerzer divided the catch among the fisher-man, the boat owner, and the hospital.
1. Dr. Schweizer settled the argument because ______.
A. he was the judge there    B. it took place at his hospital
C. he wanted some of the fish.  D. he wanted to help the patient
2. The final judgment was the ______.
A. all the fish should go to the patient
B. the fish should go to the owner of the canoe
C. the fish should be destroyed
D. everyone involved should get a third of the fish
3. The best title for this selection is ______. 
A. The Argument   B. A Wise Man’s Decision
C. The Thief      D. Right and wrong
}<bdb>
{32.
In East Africa there is a bribe(部落) of people called the Masai. They are tall and 
slim(苗条的) and carry long spears to guard their cattle against an attacking lion 
or leopard(豹). These Africans move from place to place on the rolling(绵延起伏的)
 grasslands looking for suitable grazing(牧场) and water. Mboto is twelve years old.
 He helps his father drive the cattle. If the family decides to remain in one spot 
 for a while, he helps gather sticks and thin branches to build a simple house. The 
 sticks are placed in the ground in a circle. They are then bent inwards and joined 
 at the top. Small branches and leaves fill the spaces. If it looks as if the family 
 will stay longer than usual, then the inside walls are often plastered with cattle
 manure(粪). For a door there is only a small opening to allow a person to enter. A 
 thorn(刺) fence is built around the small house to keep cattle safe at night. Lions, 
 leopards and hyenas prowl(觅食) around after dark. So the cattle would be easily killed and eaten.
When Mboto grows up into a man, he will become a true Masai warrior(勇士). He will 
have to join other warriors in the strange custom of drinking blood. The blood is
 taken from the neck of one of their cattle. It is mixed with milk and together with 
 meat. It becomes the main food for the men.
The Masai have lived this way for thousands of years. The only change that seems to have 
affected their lives is the use of the transistor(晶体管) radio. It is quite common to
 see a young warrior with a pair of earphones listening to music while has is with his cattle.
1．The underlined word plastered in the first paragraph means______.
A. painted     B. covered all over     C. put up     D. dotted
2．What do the Masai spend most of their time doing?
A. Hunting	B. Fighting against wild animals
C. Grazing their cattle	D. Building small houses
3．It can be learned from the text that______.
A. a Masai warrior drinks blood mixed with milk
B. Mboto is a strong Masai warrior
C. a thorn fence is built to keep the cattle out
D. the Masai has nearly a thousand years of history
4．Which of the following is NOT true according to the text?
A. The Masai wander over the rolling African grasslands.
B. A Masai’s simple house has a small opening as a door to allow a person to enter.
C. A Masai’s simple house is made of branches and strong sticks.
D. Modern inventions don’t affect the Masai’s lives at all.
}<bcad>
{33.
During the fourth China Beijing High-tech Industries Week, exhibitions, feature
 presentations, technological exchanges and trade talks, and other events are organized.
Exhibitions
?China International Exhibition Centre
*Section for China’s key science and technology achievements of the Ninth Five Year Plan (1996-2000)
*Environmental protection and energy section
*Section for exhibitors from other provinces and municipalities(自治市) and regions of China
?China World Trade Centre
*Exchange and Trade Fair for Science and Technology Books and Sports Information Media
*The Trade Fair for Modern Intelligent Houses and Beijing Urban Real Estate
?China Millenium Monument
*Forum(论坛)and Exhibition of Foreign Sci-tech Universities
?China Agricultural Culture Centre
*High-tech Construction Products Exhitibion
Feature Presentation
?Science and Education
*Scientists Forum on the New Century
?High-tech Industry
*Forum on Environmental Protection
*2001 Forum on Bio-technology on Traditional Chinese Medicine and Natural Medicine
Technical Exchanges and Trade Talks
?Trade talks on financial capital transformation
? Sino-Italian Forum and Trade Fair for the Development of IT and Com munications Technology
1．If you want to know more about the high-tech achievements of different parts of China, you should go to______.
A. China World Trade Centre
B. China Millenium Monument
C. China International Exhibition Centre
D. China Agricultural Culture Centre
2．These sessions mark the achievements of mankind in the fields of______.
A. electronic communications, energy and education
B. sports technology, film-industry and environmental protection
C. network technology, high-tech industries and traffic
D. medicine, weather broadcast and finance
3．The advertisement is mainly about______.
A. the major activities of the high-tech week
B. the time-table of high-tech week
C. the names of the meeting places
D. the topic of trade talks
}<caa>
{34.
LONDON----A morning’s train ride away, across the Channel, English kids talk 
about Liverpool’s soccer team in a Paris pub.
Some Parisians have even started to go to work in London.
In the 19th century, Charles Dickens compared the two great rival(竞争的) cities,
 London and Paris, in” A Tale of Two Cities.” These days, it might be A Tale of One City.
Parisians are these days likely to smile in sympathy at a visitor’s broken French and respond in polite English.
As jobs grew lack at home over recent years, perhaps 250000 Frenchmen moved across
 the Channel. With an undersea tunnel, they could travel between cities in three
 hours. The European Union freed them from immigration and customs.
Paris, rich in beauty, is more attractive. But London feels more full of life, and more fun until the pubs shut down.
“For me, the difference is that London is real, alive,” said Trevor Wheeler, a banker.
Chantal Jaouen, a professional designer, agrees.” I am French, but I’ll stay in London,” she said.
There is, of course, the other view. Julie Lenoux is a student who moved to London two 
years ago.” I think people laugh more in Paris,” she said.
In fact, London and Paris, with their obvious new similarities, are beyond the old 
descriptions. As the European Union gradually loosened controls, Londoners flocked into Paris to shop, eat and buy property.
“Both cities have changed beyond recognition.” said Larry Collins, a writer and sometimes a Londoner.
Like most people who know both well, he finds the two now fit together comfortably.
“I first fell in love with Paris in the 1950s, and it is still a wonderful place,” Collins said.
“But if I had to choose, it would be London. Things are so much more ordered, and life is better.” 
But certainly not cheaper.
In fancy parts of London, rents can be twice those on Avenue Foch in Paris.
Deciding between London and Paris requires a lifestyle choice.
Like Daphne Benoit, a French journalism student with perfect English, many young people
 are happy to be close enough so they don’t have to choose.
“I love Paris, my little neighborhood, the way I can walk around a center, but life is
 so structured,” she said. “In London, you can be who you wan. No one cares.” 
1．The best title for this passage is______.
A. Londoners and Parisians
B. A Modern Tale of Two Cities
C. The Similarity of Two Cities
D. Fancy London and Fashionable Paris
2．We can infer from the text______.
A. Paris and London has become perfect partners
B. London feels more full of life
C. life in Paris is structured
D. Paris and London have become fierce competitors
3．The underlined word” flocked” probably means______.
A. came in large numbers	B. flew a long way
C. rushed hurriedly		D. drove long distances
4．Living in Paris, you may find______.
A. life is better		B. things are cheaper
C. more attractive people	D. a job easily 
5．From the passage we can know______.
A. the two cities have developed very fast
B. London is better than Paris now
C. Paris is a favourite place for all journalism students
D. people in both London and Paris now lead a regular life
}<baaba>
{35.
A well-dressed man enforced a famous jewelry shop. He explained that he wished to buy
 a pearl for his wife’s birthday. The price didn’t matter. Since business had been 
 very good for him that year. After examining a nice black one that cost $5000, he 
 paid for the pearl in cash, shook hands with the jeweler, and left.
A few days later the man returned and said that his wife liked the pear so much that
 she wanted another one just like it. It had to be exactly the same size and quality, 
 s she wanted a pair of earrings made, “Can you give me any advice on how to get such 
 a pearl?” said the man. The jeweler regretfully replied, “I would say it’s exactly 
 impossible to find one exactly like that pearl.”
The rich man insisted that the jeweler advertise in the newspapers, offering $ 25,000 
for the matching pearl. Many people answered the advertisement but nobody had a pearl 
that was just right.
Just when the jeweler had given up hope, a little old lady came into his store. To his 
great surprise, she pulled the perfect pearl from her purse. “I don’t like to part with
 it,” she said sadly, “I inherited it from my mother, and my mother inherited it from 
 hers. But I really need the money.”
The jeweler was quick to pay her before she changed her mind. Then he called the rich 
man’s hotel to tell him the good news. The man, however, was nowhere to be found.
1. The man said he wanted to buy a pearl for ______.
A. his wife   B. his mother-in Claw
C. his own mother   D. no one
2. He paid $ 5,000 for the black pearl without bargaining because ______.
A. he was very rich    B. he wanted to make the jeweler believe him
C. he was anxious to get it   D. his business had been successful
3. He told the jeweler to get him another pearl that must be ______.
A. exactly the same size as the black on
B. exactly the same quality as the black one
C. worth no more than $ 25,000
D. exactly as big and nice as the black one
4. Many people answered the advertisement because they wanted _______.
A. to see the perfect pearl
B. to buy some beautiful pearls too 
C. to get in touch with the rich man
D. to sell their own pearl at a high price
5. The jeweler couldn’t find the man anywhere because ______.
A. he died suddenly.
B. He happened to be out 
C. He got $ 20,00 by cheating and had run away with the money.
D. He wouldn’t show up until the jeweler called him a second time.
}<abddc>
{36.
The class teacher thought that hobbies were very important for every child. She 
encouraged all her pupils to have one, and sometimes arranged for their parents 
to come and see the work they had done as a result.
One Friday morning the teacher told the class that those of them who had a hobby
 could have a holiday that afternoon to get the things they had made as parts of 
 their hobbies ready for their parents to see the following afternoon.
So on Friday afternoon, while those of the pupils who had nothing to show did their
 usual lessons, the lucky ones who had made something were allowed to go home, on 
 condition that they returned before five o’clock to bring what they were going to
 show, and to arrange them.
When the afternoon lessons began, the teacher was surprised to see that Tommy was
 not there. He was the laziest boy in the class, and the teacher found it difficult 
 to believe that he had a hobby. However, at a quarter to five, Tommy arrived with a 
 beautiful collection of butterflies(蝴蝶) in glass cases. After his teacher had
 admired them and helped him to arrange them on a table in the classroom, she was
 surprised to see Tommy pick them up again and begin to leave.
“What are you doing, Tommy?” she asked.” Those things must remain here until tomorrow 
afternoon. That’s when the parents are coming to see them.” 
“I know they are coming then,” answered Tommy,” and I will bring them back tomorrow; 
but my big brother doesn’t want them to be out of our house at night in case they are stolen.” 
“But what has it got to do with your big brother?” asked the teacher.” Aren’t the butterflies yours?” 
“No,” answered Tommy.” They belong to him.” 
“But Tommy, you are supposed to show your own hobby here, not somebody else’s!” said the teacher.
“I know that,” answered Tommy.” My hobby is watching my brother collecting butterflies.” 
1．What’s the best title for this passage?
A. Important Hobbies	B. Tommy’s Hobby
C. Different Hobbies	D. Hobby of Collecting Butterflies
2．The teacher______.	
A. asked the pupils who were in her class to bring something they had made
B. was certain that her pupils were good at making things, so she wanted to show them to the parents
C. invited the parents to come and see what the pupils had made
D. allowed the pupils who had hobbies not to go to class that Friday afternoon
3．After reading the passage the readers will laugh. Why?
A. Because Tommy was so lazy a boy.
B. Because the teacher knew so little about Tommy.
C. Because Tommy had made nothing at all.
D. Because Tommy had a strange idea about hobby.
}<bcd>
{37.
 “The sea is the common possession of all nations. It belongs equally to all. No 
 one can take it entirely to themselves; nor is it‘foreign’to any one.” 
This was the decision of John Marshall, chief Justice of the United States from 
1801 to 1835. It was made known as a basic rule of the sea that no one, and therefore 
everyone, owns the ocean. This means that outside territorial waters (the waters 
within three miles of a country’s coast),the law is whatever nations agree on in 
peacetime and whatever the strongest navy powers can enforce in wartime.
After the United States bought Alaska, Americans began to seize Canadians who were 
hunting seals outside Alaskan territorial waters. The Americans said that the seals
 were American possession because they often came into the Alaskan shores owned by 
 the United States. International judges disagreed with this reasoning. In some 
 cases, however, the special rights of a nation that makes good use of an open-sea area are recognized.
All of the sea’s rules are set up by international conferences and agreements.
1．The idea that the sea” belongs equally to all” was put out by______.
A. an unwritten agreement
B. a U.S. Supreme Court decision
C. an international conference
D. a written agreement
2．The basic rule of the sea means that______.
A. any powerful nation may control the sea
B. any area of the sea belongs to the nation closest to it
C. no one has whole rights to the open sea
D. no nation has any sea rights
3．International judges decided that______.
A. Canada had no sealing rights off Alaska
B. the Canadians could hunt the seals
C. the United States could own the seals
D. the Americans could not hunt the seals
4．Nations may obtain special rights on open waters by______.
A. overrunning those waters
B. guarding the waters
C. using the waters regularly
D. spreading out their territorial waters
5．The main idea of this passage is that______.
A. the rule of the sea was made known by John Marshall
B. some nations are able to acquire special open-sea rights.
C. every nation owns its territorial waters
D. the laws of the sea should be set up by international agreements
}<bcbcd>
{38.
A man was sitting in the park watching the ducks on the pond. When a woman 
approached him. She had a white poodle(鬃毛狮子狗) on a leash (系狗的链子).
She sat down on a bench, took out a magazine and began to read .
After it had been sitting quietly for about ten minutes, the poodle turned and looked up at the man.
“Excuse me,” the dog whispered. “But you look like a kind man. Please buy me from his awful woman.”
The man could hardly believe his ears. A dog was whispering to him. In English! 
“She is so mean to me,” the dog continued. “She never pets me or plays with me
 when she’s in a bad mood, which is most of the time.”
The man was amazed to hear the dog say all this. He was even more surprised when
 the dog added, “And I’m really a very good dog. I’m quite famous, too. I won a
 medal in the last war and was twice wounded in action. I’ve rescued three children-two
 from drowning and one from a fire.”
The man decided that he would try to buy the dog from the woman. He would pay a
 lot of money if necessary. The dog would soon earn tens of thousands of dollars 
 on television. It would be the world’s first talking dog.
“Excuse me,” he said to the woman, “but I love your little dog. Will you sell him to me?”
“I’ll be delighted to sell him,” the woman said. “You can have him for ten dollars.”
“Ten dollars!” the man said. “Only the dollars? Why so little?” “Because,” 
the woman said, “he’s a trouble-making liar.”
1. The poodle______.
A. sat on either side of man and woman
B. could read the magazine 
C. was leading the woman
D. belonged to the woman
2. The dog ______.
A. insulted the man
B. asked the man to buy it
C. started talking as soon as it sat down
D. couldn’t speak properly
3.The man was surprised______.
A. to hear it speak  B. to see it feed
C. to hear it bark  D. to see if being beaten
4. The dog explained that it had ______.
A. stopped a fireman from saving three children
B. never been in the war 
C. acted heroically in dangerous situations
D. refused a medal in the last war
5. The woman was ______.
A. advertising her dog 
B. happy to sell her dog
C. reluctant to sell her dog
D. Hoping her dog would earn thousand of dollars on television
}<dbacb>
{39.
Motorola set out a special training plan programme for children last week with 
the aim of developing children’s business skills and preparing them for a future as entrepreneurs.
Eighty-seven children aged between 12 and 16 from Beijing and Tianjin attended 
the one-week training programme called “Youth Discovery” directed by Motorola
 University’s (MU) instructors and marketing specialists. The children learned
 about dealing with a practical problem-marketing and worked out a marketing plan
 by themselves. Last week 26 children of Motorola employees in Tianjin completed 
 their training in the MU-Tianjin Learning Center.
Through the training programme, children learnt how to get information through
 different kinds of sources, determine end-user needs, make up messages of value
 to customers, and communicate using various means and equipment.
Educators acted only as team” directors” ,providing children to discover their own
 answers. The children gave their solutions to Motorola’s management and their parents on the last day of the programme.
The children, most of whom were primary and middle school students, presented themselves freely.
The students said that they preferred the open and practical way of learning.
“Youth Discovery” ,started by Motorola’s former president Robert Galvin, designed
 and carried out by Motorola University, aimed to bring the talents(才能) of young 
 people into full play and encouraged them to discover how their skills can contribute to a team to help it reach an aim.
1．The underlined word” entrepreneurs” in the first paragraph probably means.______
A. schoolmasters	B. actors
C. managers	D. scientists
2．Which statement is true according to the passage?
A. The instructors taught the students how to work out a marketing plan.
B. The programme was started, designed and carried out by Motorola University.
C. The programme is very common in Tianjin
D. The programme aims at developing the children’s ability to solve practical problems.
3．What role do the educators play in the programme?
A. Presidents.	B. Directors.
C. Businessmen.	D. Employees.
4． “Youth Discovery” is a great success because______.
A. its way agrees with children’s characters of interest
B. it’s designed by Motorola University
C. the children’s parents took part in it
D. the children come from Beijing and Tianjin.
}<cdba>
{40.
Here are four pieces of news from China Daily.
SHANGHAI-The Huachen Group, which has put 83 million yuan in the development of 
the e-commerce market since its official registration late last year, recently 
held a meeting in Shanghai to show the use of its newly opened tourism business 
payment network. The network aims to serve tourists from all over the world, but
 especially from Europe and the United States where credit cards are popularly used.
 After opening the www.chinaecnet.com website, netizens can get information about
 hotels and tourism services on tourism page. Hotels and services can be reserved 
 and payments made through credit cards. The network opened in February in Beijing.
SYDNEY-The Sydney Olympic flame will travel underwater on Australia’s Great Barrier 
Reef during the torch relay(火炬接力) following a successful test.
Scuba diver Wendy Craig, a marine biologist, will carry the torch on a three-to-four-minute
 underwater journey at Agincourt Reef on June 27, creating Olympic history, organizers said yesterday.
Burning at 2000 degrees, the torch is expected to remain alight three metres underwater
 because of a special kind of technology which creates a “fierce flame” -too powerful 
 to be drowned out by water. Charles Tegner, managing director of torch creator, said 
 the flame would burn like a flare from oxygen-producing chemicals.
BEIJING-The election of a new leader in Taiwan can not change the fact that Taiwan is 
a part of Chinese territory.” Taiwan Independence” in whatever form will never be allowed, 
according to a statesman of China’s central government.
“We should listen to what the new leader in Taiwan says and watch what he does. We will
 observe where he will lead cross-Straits relations. We are willing to exchange views on
 cross-Straits relations and peaceful reunification with all parties, organizations and
 personages in Taiwan who favor(赞同) the one China principle,” says the statesman, which
 was released(发布)by the Taiwan Affairs Office of the CPC Central Committee.
HAIKOU-Customs officers in Haikou, capital of South China’s Hainan Province, recently 
stopped a boat loaded with 781 cases of foreign-brand cigarettes being smuggled(走私)into 
China. The cigarettes are estimated to be worth more than 1.8 million yuan, said a customs 
discovered the smuggling boat as they were going around the northern sea area of Yangpu Port.
The smuggled cigarettes cases, packed into two containers, were disguised to avoid(回避) 
being examined. The boat was registered(登记) in the coastal city of Xiamen in East
 China’s Fujian Province. All eight suspects(疑犯) aboard the boat were kept by the police in Haikou.
1．Why does the network aim to serve tourists especially from Europe and the USA?
A. Because they are from developed countries.
B. Because the payments of hotels and services should be made through credit cards.
C. Because people in these countries travel much more than those countries.
D. Because they have more computers than others.
2．Which of the following statements is NOT true according to the second piece of news?
A. The whole torch relay will be held three metres underwater.
B. The underwater journey of the torch will play an important part in Olympic history.
C. A test has been made before this activity.
D. Some chemicals will help the flame burn by producing oxygen.
3．Which is the best title for the third piece of news?
A. Ready to Fight	B. No Good End
C. Wait and See	D. Peace Comes First
4．Which of the following best explains the underlined word” disguised” in the last piece of news?
A. made different from normal	B. designed for a good purpose
C. hidden		D. pretended
}<baca>
{41.
Forces other than damaging winds are also at work inside tornadoes(龙卷风). Sometimes, 
as the wind passes a house, the walls and ceiling burst apart as if a bomb had gone off 
inside. This explosion is caused by the low air pressure at the center of a tornado.
The pressure at the center of a tornado is usually 13 pounds per square inch. However,
 inside the house the air pressure is normal, about 15 pounds per square inch. The 
 difference of 2 pounds per square inch between the inside and outside pressure may 
 not seem like much. But suppose a tornado passes over a small building that measures 
 20 by 10 by 10 feet. On each square inch of the building, there is 2 pounds of pressure 
 from the inside that is not balanced by air pressure outside the building. On the 
 ceiling, that adds up to an unbalanced pressure of 57600 pounds. The pressure of the
 four walls adds up to 172800 pounds.
If windows are open in the building, some of the inside air will rush out through them. 
This will balance the pressure inside and outside the building. But if the windows are
 shut tightly, the huge inside pressure may cause the building to burst.
Unfortunately, heavy rain often occurs in the storms that later produce tornadoes, so
 people often shut their windows. This may cause far worse damage later.
1．What did the paragraph before this passage most probably discuss?
A. Measuring rainfall from a storm
B. The powerful winds of tornadoes.
C. The kinds of damage caused by explosions
D. Repairing the damage from tornadoes.
2．Which of the following is the main topic of the passage?
A. How tornadoes can be prevented.
B. When tornadoes usually occur.
C. Where tornadoes are formed.
D. Why tornadoes cause so much damage.
3．Tornadoes can destroy buildings because the______.
A. force of a tornado increases the air pressure in a building.
B. air pressure at the center of a tornado is over 172000 pounds.
C. weight of a tornado can destroy a building’s roof when it passes over head.
D. air pressure inside a tornado is less than the air pressure inside a building.
4．What is the difference per square inch between the air pressure inside a
 building and the air pressure inside a tornado?
A. 2 pounds.     B. 10 pounds.     C. 13 pounds.     D. 15 pounds.
}<cdda>
{42.
The basic flag of the United States is one of the world’s oldest national flags. 
Only the basic flags of Austria, Denmark, Great Britain, the Netherlands, Sweden, 
and Switzerland are older.
During the discovery and settlement of what is now the United States, the flags of 
various European nations were flown over the land, as symbols of possession. Later,
 in the Colonial and Revolutionary War periods, flags representing famous persons,
 places, and events were flown in the American Colonies.
The first official flag of the United States was created by Congress on June 14,1777, 
It consisted of 13 alternate red an white stripes and 13 white stars in a field of blue, 
representing the 13 colonies that had declared their independence in 1776. Congress 
adopted a new flag of 15 stars and 15 stripes in 1795 to give representation to the two 
new states admitted into the Union, Vermont and Kentucky.
By 1817, there were 20 states in the Union, and it became apparent that adding one 
stripe for each new state would destroy the shape of the flag. As a result, Congress 
in 1818 restored the original design of 13 stripes and provided that each state was 
to be represented by one star. In 1912 President William H. Taft made the first official
 provision for the arrangement of the stars. He ordered that there be six even rows of
 eight stars each. Previously the arrangement of the stars had been left to the flag-maker’s fancy.
The evolution of the Stars and Stripes reflects the growth of the United States. After 
the admission of Hawaii into the Union in 1959, the flag was officially changed for the 
26th times since its creation. There are many government flags flown in the United States 
in addition to the national flag. Among them are the president’s and vice-president’s flags
 and those of the federal departments and some federal agencies. Each state in the Union has 
 an official flag. The United States Navy uses special flags for signaling.
1．The basic flag of the United States is______.
A. the oldest national flag in the world.
B. one of the world’s oldest flags.
C. the most beautiful flag in the West.
D. as old as the basic flags of some European nations.
2．The first official flag of the United States was adopted______.
A. before the Independence War
B. right after the Independence War
C. when independence was declared in 1776
D. during the War of Independence which ended in 1783
3．The 13 red and white stripes and 13 white stars represent______.
A. 13 independent states
B. the colonies that declared independence in 1776
C. the U.S. Congress
D. 13 famous figures in the American colonies
4．Why was the original design of 13 stripes restored in 1818?
A. Too many stripes would destroy the shape of the flag.
B. Congress insisted 13 is the best number.
C. That was a decision President Taft had made.
D. The American people suggested it.
}<acdd>
{43.
If you’re in charge of a project, the key to success is getting everyone to want to 
help you. As a director. I point. I gently push the actors in the direction I want them to go.
	In the 1986 movie nothing in common, Jackie Gleason’s character, Max Basner, gets 
	fired from his job as a clothing salesman. The scene, shot on a boat, shows Max’s 
	despair about being out of work. I was looking for some gesture that would allow Max to show his feelings.
	Jackie had far more experience at everything than I did, and at first I was frightened.
	What could I possibly tell “The Great One” about acting? Out of fear I decided to
	direct by suggestion, and I sat down with Gleason to talk about the scene. “So Max is and, right?” I said.
	Gleason nodded.
	“And he’s probably still carrying his pens with his name on them C the ones he used to hand out to his customers, right?”
	Gleason nodded.
	“So what would you want to do with the pens after you were fired?”
	He was silent for a moment. “Why don’t I throw them overboard?”
	I stood up and turned toward the crew. “Hey, everybody. Jackie has a wonderful idea. Let’s shoot it”.
	After filming the scene, Gleason called me over and said with a smile, “Garry, what
	kind of wonderful idea am I going to have tomorrow?”
	You and your team can discover the answers to problems together. When there are no prizes or gold stars.
	For who gets the solution first, you’ll all benefit when everything turns out right.
1. The author tells us that to succeed in a project you are in charge of you should ______.
A. make everyone work for you 			B. get everyone willing to help you
C. let people know you have the final say	D. keep sending out orders to them
2. It can be inferred that__________.
A. Jackie Gleason is the director of the film Nothing in Common 
B. Jackie Gleason is very angry when he is fired from his job.
C. Max, a character in film, is in very low spirits when he loses his job.
D. Jackie Gleason is the writer of the film Nothing in Common.
3. “The Great One” in paragraph 3 refers to _______.
A. Gleason 		B. the director himself
C. Max 			D. Max’s boss
4. Why did Gleason call the director over and smile at him? Because Gleason _______.
A. thought his wonderful idea was accepted by the latter
B. succeeded in hitting upon a wonderful idea.
C. was confident about his work the next day
D. appreciated the latter’s way of directing films
5. The most suitable title for the passage is ________.
A. Directing Film 		    B. The Key to Success
C. A Wonderful Experience  D. Working with Film Stars
}<bcadb>
{44.
A holiday jet pilot（飞行员）said that he would land and call the police after a woman refused to stop smoking.
	He WARNED Maureen Harkavy, “Put that cigarette（香烟）out ,or I’ll land the plane and have you arrested（逮捕）”
Maureen, 47, was so shocked she wrote to airline’s chairman. But his reply was even ruder.
	“You seem to think you have a God C given right to pollute your neighbours’
	atmosphere,” wrote John Ferriday of Paramount Airways.
	(a) Said Maureen, “I only found out about it when I was checking in. I’m a
	nervous flyer so I lit a cigarette during the flight. A stewardess（空姐）asked
	me to put it out, but I said I wanted to carry on as there was no rule against 
	smoking on the plane.” She was just finishing her cigarette when the pilot arrived.
	(b) “I’ve never seen such an unpleasant letter,” she said, “I don’t think I’ll 
	ever fly again.” But there was a funny side. Maureen explained, “We were offered
	duty C free（免税的）cigarette from the stewardess on the plane!”
	(c) Mr Ferriday went on, “Believe me, you haven’t Especially when you travel on my planes.”
	Maureen and her husband Michael were moved to paramount flight just before they 
	left Portugal. But they were not told of the company’s no smoking policy.
	(d) “He was loud and rude,” said Maureen. “He said if I lit another cigarette he
	would land the plane at Bordeaux and hand me to the French police.”
	Later, from her home in Mosely, Birmingham, Maureen wrote to company and received the rude reply.
1. The Second half of the story has been in wrong order. (parts a C d). Choose the
 rearranged order （重新排列的顺序）which you think is right.
A. a, c, b, d	B. c, a, b, d	C. c, a, d, b	D. d, a, b, c
2. Maureen Harkavy _________on the plane.
A. accepted the warning
B. agreed to the warning
C. refused to do what she was told to 
D. was so shocked that she wrote to the airline’s chairman.
3. In the answer letter to Maureen Harkavy the airline’s chairman_______.
A. made an apology to her for his worker’s rudeness.
B. made sure that he would solve the problem.
C. said that she had the right to smoke on his plane because the
 right is given by God to everyone
D. actually completely agreed with what the pilot said
4. From the story we can see that the writer probably takes the side of _________.
A. the pilot		B. the airline’s chairman
C. the stewardess  D. Maureen Harkavy
}<ccdd>
{45.
Not very long ago, a special family system(体系) existed in certain parts of South India.
 In this system, the actual head of a family unit was the mother’s eldest brother, though
 the mother also had an important position in the family. In families of this kind, a 
 husband was actually no more than a visitor. He did not live with his wife, but with
 his own mother, brothers and sisters in another house. He saw his sons and daughters 
 sometimes, but the man who actually fed and cared for them and acted as their father 
 was their uncle-their mother’s brother.
But this system, in which brother and sisters take the place of the father, no longer
 exists in South India except in a few villages. Economic changes have had far reaching 
 effect on family life. Family life began to change when men went out to work in factories
 and offices instead of working with their mothers, brothers, and sisters on the land. When 
 a man went out to work he had money of his own and could buy his own land and build his own
 family, instead of depending on his mother and his brothers. He wanted to be independent. 
 This is an example of the way in which economic relations can have an effect on family relation-ships.
1．The best title of this passage is______.
A. Husband Actually Visitor in Family
B. Family System in South India
C. Wife Has Important Position in Family
D. Economic Relations Affects Family Relationships
2．Who had the actual control of a family in South India not long ago?
A. The mother.	B. The mother’s eldest brother.
C. The father	D. The father’s mother.
3．In this system, the husband lived together with______.
A. his wife		B. his sons and daughters
C. his mother, brothers and sisters	D. his wife’s brother
4．What has caused such a strange family system to die away?
A. The fact that the mother has not got any brother.
B. The fact that the father has got his own house and land.
C. The changes in economic relations.
D. The changes in family relationships.
}<bbcc>
{46.
The famous director of a big and expensive movie planned to film a beautiful sunset
 over the ocean, so that the audiences could see his hero and heroine in front of it
 at the end of the film as they said goodbye to each other for ever. He sent his camera 
 crew(摄制组) out one evening to film the sunset for him.
The next morning he said to the men, “Have you provided me with the sunset?” 
“No, sir.” The men answered.
The director was angry. “Why not?” he asked.
“Well, sir,” one of the men answered,” we are on the east coast here, and the sun sets
 in the west. We can get a sunrise over the sea, if necessary, but not a sunset.” 
“But I want a sunset!” the director shouted.” Go to the airport, take the next flight
 to the west coast, and get one.” 
But then a young secretary had an idea,” Why don’t you photograph a sunrise,” she
 suggested, “and then play it backwards? Then it would look like a sunset.” 
“That’s a good idea!” the director said. Then he turned to the camera crew and said,
” Tomorrow morning I want you to get me a beautiful sunrise over the sea.” 
The camera crew went out early the next morning and filmed a bright sunrise over the 
beach in the middle of the beautiful bay(海湾).Then at nine o’clock they took it to 
the director. “Here it is, sir.” They said and gave it to him .He was very pleased.
They all went to the studio(摄影棚). “All right,” the director explained, “now our 
hero and heroine are going to say goodbye. Run the film backwards so that we can see 
the ‘sunset’ behind them.” 
The” sunset” began, but after a quarter of a minute, the director suddenly put his 
face in his hands and shouted to the camera crew to stop.
The birds in the film were flying backwards, and the waves on the sea were going 
away from the beach.
1．One evening, the director sent his camera crew out______.
A. to watch a beautiful sunset
B. to find an actor and an actress
C. to film a scene on the sea
D. to meet the audience
2．Which of the following is NOT true?
A. The crew had to follow the secretary’s advice.
B. If you want to see a sunrise, the east coast is the place to go to.
C. The camera crew wasn’t able to film the scene the first day.
D. The director ordered his crew to stop filming the “sunset” .
3．The director wanted to film the sunset over the ocean because______.
A. it went well with the separation of the hero and the heroine
B. when they arrived at the beach it was already in the evening
C. it was more moving than a sunrise
D. the ocean looked more beautiful at sunset
4．After the “sunset” began, the director suddenly put his face in his hands______.
A. because he was moved to tears
B. as he saw everything in the film moving backwards
C. as the sunrise did not look as beautiful as he had imagined
D. because he was disappointed with the performance of the hero and heroine
}<cdab>
{47.
Ever since news of widespread food recalls caused by a carcinogenic dye broke, there
 has been confusion over possible links to the country of the same name, but Sudan 
 officials say there is no connection whatever. 
   Sudan1 is a red industrial dye that has been found in some chilli powder, but
   was banned in food products across the European Union (EU) in July 2003. 
   Since the ban was put in place, EU officials have been striving to remove some
   food products from the shelves. So far 580 products have been recalled. 
Last week Sudan’s Embassy in the United Kingdom asked the Food Standards Agency (FSA)
 for clarification of the origin of the dye’s name. 
   Omaima Mahmoud Al Sharief, a press official at Sudan’s Embassy in China, explained 
   the purpose of the inquiry was to clear up any misunderstanding over links between 
   the country and the poisonous dye. 
　　"We want to keep an eye on every detail and avoid any misunderstanding there," she
 said. "Our embassy to Britain asked them how the dye got that name and whether the dye
 had something to do with our country. But they told us there was no relationship."  
   The FSA, an independent food security watchdog in Britain, received a letter from the 
   Sudanese embassy last week. 
　"They asked us why the dye is named Sudan, however, we also do not know how it got the 
name," she said. "People found the dye in 1883 and gave it the name. Nobody knows the 
reason, and we cannot give any explanation before we find out." 
   Sudan dyes, which include Sudan1 to 4, are red dyes（颜料） used for colouring 
   solvents（溶剂）, oils, waxes, petrol, and shoe and floor polishes. They are classified
   as carcinogens by the International Agency for Research on Cancer. 

1. What does the underlined word mean in paragraph one?
A. Causing cancer.    B. Having side effect.    C. Containing poison.    D.Poisonous.
2. How did the Sudan1 get its name?
A. The dye is often produced in Sudan.
B. The dye has something to do with the country named Sudan.
C. Nobody is sure of the origin of the name.
D. Many foods produced in Sudan contain the dye.
3. We can infer from the passage that.
A. the Sudan government is paying much attention to the food safety
B. Sudan1 is often used to be added to the food
C. people didn’t realize the danger of Sudan1 until 2003
D. many food shops will be closed down
4. Which of the following is the best title?
A. Keep away from Sudan1
B. No Sudan1 dye links to the country
C. How Sudan1 dye got its name?
D. Pay attention to the food safety
}<acbb>
{48.
Long bus rides are like television shows. They have a beginning,a middle,and an end
 with commercials thrown in every three or four minutes. The commercials are unavoidable.
 They happen whether you want them or not. Every couple of minutes a billboard glides by 
 outside the bus window. "Buy Super Clean Toothpaste.""Drink Good Wet Root Beer.""Fill
 up with Pacific Gas."Only if you sleep,which is equal to turning the television set 
 off,are you spared the unending cry of "You Need It! Buy It Now!"
The beginning of the ride is comfortable and somewhat exciting,even if you’ve traveled 
that way before. Usually some things have changednew houses,new buildings,sometimes even 
a new road. The bus driver has a style of driving and it’s fun to try to figure it out 
the first hour or so. If the driver is particularly reckless （鲁莽的） or daring,the 
ride can be as thrilling as a suspense story. Will the driver pass the truck in time? 
Will the driver move into the rightor the lefthand lane? After a while,of course,the 
excitement dies down. Sleeping for a while helps pass the middle hours of the ride. Food
 always makes bus rides more interesting. But you’ve got to be careful of what kind of 
 food you eat. Too much salty food can make you very thirsty between stops.
The end of the ride is somewhat like the beginning. You know it will soon be over and 
there’s a kind of expectation and excitement in that. The seat of course,has become 
harder as the hours have passed. By now you’ve sat with your legs crossed,with your
 hands in your lap,with your hands on the armrestseven with your hands crossed behind
 your head. The end comes just at no more ways to sit.

1.According to the passage,what do the passengers usually see when they are on a long bus trip?
A.Buses on the road.                B.Films on television.
C.Advertisements on the billboards.    D.Gas stations.
2.What is the purpose of this passage?
A.To give the writer’s opinion about long bus trips.
B.To persuade you to take a long bus trip.
C.To explain how bus trips and television shows differ.
D.To describe the billboards along the road.
3.The writer of this passage would probably favor .
A.bus drivers who aren’t reckless      B.driving alone
C.a television set on the bus          D.no billboards along the road
4.The writer feels long bus rides are like TV shows because .
A.the commercials both on TV shows and on billboards along the road are fun
B.they both have a beginning,a middle,and an end,with commercials in between
C.the drivers are always reckless on TV shows just as they are on buses
D.both traveling and watching TV are not exciting.
5.The writer thinks that the end of the ride is somewhat like the beginning because both are .
A.exciting    B.comfortable    C.tiring    D.boring
}<cadba>
{49.
Modern man has cleared the forests for farmland and for wood,and has also carelessly 
burned them. More than that,though,he has also interfered with the invisible bonds
 between the living things in the forests. There are many examples of this kind of 
 destruction. The harmfulness of man’s interference can be seen in what happened many 
 years ago in the forest of the Kaibab plateau （凯亚巴布高原） of northern Arizona. 
 Man tried to improve on the natural web of forest life and destroyed it instead.
The Kaibab had a storybook forest of largesized pine,Douglas fir,white fir,blue and 
Engelmann spruce. In 1882 a visitor noted,"We,who ... have wandered through its forests
 and parks,have come to regard it as the most enchanting region it has ever been our 
 privilege to visit."This was also the living place of the Rocky Mountain mule deer. 
 Indians hunted there every autumn to gather meat and skins. The forest also had mountain 
 lions,timber wolves and bobcats that kept the deer from multiplying too rapidly.
Then,in 1906,President Theodore Roosevelt made the Kaibab a national game preserve. 
Deer hunting was forbidden. Government hunters started killing off the deer’s enemies.
 In 25 years’ time,6,250 mountain lions,wolves and bobcats were killed. Before the 
 program,there were about 4,000 deer in the Kaibab,by 1924,there were about 100,000.
The deer ate every leaf and twig they could reach. But there was not nearly enough food. 
Hunting of deer was permitted again. This caused a slight decrease in the deer herd，but 
a far greater loss resulted from starvation and disease. Some 60 percent of the deer herd
 died in two winters. By 1930 the herd had dropped to 20,000 animals. By 1942 it was down to 8,000.

1.The destruction of the environment of the Kaibab resulted from .
A.turning the forest into cultivated land
B.interfering with natural cycle of forest life
C.forest fires caused by man’s carelessness
D.cutting the trees for building materials
2."Engelmann spruce"（Para. 2） is most likely the name of .
A.a tree    B.an animal    C.a mountain    D.a game
3.The number of the deer in the Kaibab had increased enormously in  years’ time.
A.25      B.6           C.18           D.12
4.Years later,large numbers of deer in the Kaibab died mainly because of .
A.the cold             B.the organized kill
C.the shortage of food   D.the poor management
}<bacc>
{50.
　In the USA Forbes magazine has published its annual list of the richest people in 
the world. Bill Gates of Microsoft is the richest man again for the eleventh successive
 year with a fortune of fortyfour billion dollars.
　　There are a record 691 dollar billionaires according to Forbes magazine. Between
 them they have a fortune of two point two trillion dollars. The highest concentration
 of the ultrarich is in New York followed by Moscow and San Fransisco and then London
 and Los Angeles. But in total the very wealthy live in fortyseven different countries
 with Iceland Kazakstan Ukraine and Poland entering the list for the first time this year.
　　Laksmi Mittal,an Indian born steel tycoon （巨头）enjoyed the biggest increase in 
personal fortune. His net worth has quadrupled （变成四倍）to thirteen billion dollars
 making him the world’s third richest man. Ingvar Kamprad founder of the Swedish furniture
 chain Ikea also saw a big increase in wealth taking him to the sixth place. Developing 
 countries make more of a showing than in past years ― there are for example three Russians 
 and four Indians in the top sixty richest people, though surprisingly perhaps none from
 China excluding Hong Kong. Asian wealth is probably underrepresented as its usually spread 
 among families whereas Forbes looks at individuals. Relatively few women feature in the
 list ― among them is JK Rowling,author of the Harry Potter novels ranked 620th with a 
 fortune of 519 million dollars. New entrants to the list include the founders of the 
 Internet search group Google Sergie Brin and Larry Page each worth more than seven billion
 dollars after their company’s recent stock market debut. The richest Italian is the prime 
 minister Silvio Berlusconi ranked number 25 in the global wealth league.
1. Which of the following persons has the largest fortune according to this year’s  Forbes magazine?
A. Laksmi Mittal.       B. Ingvar Kamprad.
C. JK Rowling.         D. Silvio Berlusconi.
2. There are about _____ persons with a fortune between 100 million dollars and 519 million dollars in the world.
A. 300    B. 180    C. 70    D. 150
3. Which of the following statements is NOT true?
A. No Chinese has entered the top sixty richest people in the world.
B. Russia is a developing country.
C. This is the first time that Sergie Brin and Larry Page has been included in the list.
D. There are more billionaires in New York than any other city in the world. 
4. We can infer from the passage that ______. 
A. There are more billionaires in London than in Moscow.
B. Ukraine is a very rich country in the world.
C. JK Rowling’s novels have sold very well.
D. The IT industry is a profitmaking industry. 
}<acac>